# 4 : Children of the Mind (1996) by Orson Scott Card
See latest ad below – Perhaps she is taking the tactic that someone may think she is running sans Party:
How come this person can understand the concept but my therapist, who’s supposed to help people with emotional problems, cannot? Or is my therapist putting on a show? But she seems to genuinely not understand why I can’t use reinforcement to make myself feel what I know.
Massage is recommended in traditional Chinese medicine to unblock the patient’s meridians, stimulate the circulation of blood and qi, loosen stiff joints and muscles, and strengthen the immune system.
How many other girls were humiliated because I said nothing? Harassed and worse.
September: Treasury Secretary John Snow testifies before the House Financial Services Committee to recommend that Congress enact “legislation to create a new Federal agency to regulate and supervise the financial activities of our housing-related government sponsored enterprises” and set prudent and appropriate minimum capital adequacy requirements.
hear your life
Space movies have always been a place for extreme optimisms and utopia, but also the opposite, dystopian views, extremist societies. They give me so much to think about. I like them alot.
+ HICOUP & DEVYNITY – Domestic Violence
1And he shewed me a pure river of water of life, clear as crystal, proceeding out of the throne of God and of the Lamb.
We had a fiddle lesson, and ate a wholesome lunch ourselves, and checked several stores for a lost hat. :( We even went to the library to try to get the last Harry Potter book for reading material on the plane.
this year we. are. GOING.
6) Bad highlights.
As of 2006 Blur has released seven full-length albums, five of which went to #1 in the United Kingdom and all of which reached the top 15. Albarn has written the lyrics to nearly every song released by the band since their formation. He had publicly stated he was waiting for the return of Graham Coxon, who left the band prior to the release of Think Tank, to produce more Blur material; however, Coxon has refused to return, and Albarn stated in September 2005 that he will play guitar on the next Blur record. Albarn Quoted, "If Coxon won't return then I'll be playing guitar but it'll just be fast, punk songs. Why don't I get another guitarist? Because there's none better than Coxon."
the building it is in used to be a movie theater, and so it is a huge space.
04. Because, even though I spend a good chunk of my time swimming laps around the anxiety pool or melting into depression, I am also able to feel happy now. Not all the time (usually content is good for me), but I recognize moments of joy. So even though pulling out of the eating disorder brought on an effing tidal wave of negative emotions that I’m still trying to acknowledge and deal with, it also allowed me to experience moments of positivity which is really cool. And WAY better than the numb, anxious being I was when I was in the disorder.
5Blessed are the meek,
Hi Friends!
There are 2 lowpoints on this album:
Tomorrow (3/2/12) on the lawn at the Grove (189 The Grove Drive) from 11 a.m. to 8 p.m., with a live concert by the Vivian Girls at 7 p.m.
“She’s accepting money from the von Baren’s and I think they are giving it cause of what Master von Baren did to Dad. I don’t like it”
While an officemate is out, move their chair to the elevator.
Add the margarine and beat it in as well as you can (it will stay lumpy but try to separate it as much as possible at this stage)
To Conclude:
My goal was to learn about the person I am with instead of just thinking that he was cute or what he may be thinking of me. I try to take the time to actually have a real conversation. In doing so, I found that I have been creating a large circle of friends that endure even to today.
½ cup rolled oats
Phew, quite a week in food! Hope you had just of a great week as I did! :)
Now, we are off to do some delivering!
Top each mushroom cap with a quarter of the stuffing mixture and bake in the oven for 10 minutes. Serve on a bed of fresh baby spinach or mixed greens, top each cap with the rest of the goat cheese, and drizzle with honey balsamic glaze.
Ron Paul said something very brilliant about economics today…and then totally blew it by talking about foreign policy.
Needless to say when I woke up to a particularly balmy morning here in Vancouver, I immediately went to my freezer to pull out some frozen Americano cubes. Enter, vegan mocha iced capps.
They sat around the table, three generations of women.
(Winner info at the end...)
Tricia Goyer is a CBA best-selling author and the winner of two American Christian Fiction Writers’ Book of the Year Awards (Night Song and Dawn of a Thousand Nights). She co-wrote 3:16 Teen Edition with Max Lucado and contributed to the Women of Faith Study Bible. Also a noted marriage and parenting writer, she lives with her husband and children in Arkansas. You can find her online at www.triciagoyer.com or at her weekly radio show, Living Inspired.
Hulk: A lot of people say that this is his movie. I frankly don’t disagree. We’ve had so much of the others so far, and this was a gamble for Joss since he cast someone not everyone was on board with at first. Hulk was at the center of this movie. No, I should specify, Bruce Banner was. He had it mostly under control now but his self-loathing hasn’t changed, and he admits to attempting suicide to stop his pain. It was such a strong moment, and his friendship with Stark and his growth as a character was great. In my Incredible Hulk review I said that I wasn’t a big fan of Norton’s performance, and that’s because this is more who I wanted to see. He’s brilliant, not an action hero, sort of mild mannered and tortured, and by the time Hulk comes out at the end, we were literally all cheering in the theater. He had some of the funniest moments of the entire movie in the last half, and I think Ruffalo pulled it off entirely.
You ask us to remember the boys you gladly forget
Another key piece to the Sixers’ young puzzle is Thaddeus Young. He re-signed with the Sixers this offseason while a restricted free agent and Collins is quite pleased to have his services for the foreseeable future.
This is definitely a novella for Beatles fans who want to follow Brite’s line of thought in positing a hypothetical romantic relationship between Lennon and McCartney beyond the usual realm of fanfiction. (Oh, they’re out there. I won’t tell you where, but they’re out there.) Because it’s so thinly veiled and the context is, well, missing, you might want to brush up on the Beatles before you read Plastic Jesus, if it interests you, but if you’re curious about gay rights, this isn’t the novella to enlighten you.
Tonight, in my favorite master’s class, I was reminded that sometimes we have to stop thinking and start singing to find the truth. The greatest part of ourselves is not our ego, but that self which is always changing and allusive whom we can meet best in art.
As i gazed at him, he smiled at me and raised his hand. His large hand cupped my face and he wiped away a tear from my eye with his thumb. I didnt even realise i was weeping.
- HOUSING: making 83 families homeless, and refusing them to offer them alternative sites.
I would be glad to hear a coherent argument against the content of this open letter, Mr Cameron, but fully understand that your vocal appeasement of resurgent Islam makes such a response more than a little unlikely. This is a shame, because I am sure I speak for many millions of British people who find your official endorsement of sharia law in Britain baffling in the extreme.
M&M Antiques,,,,which is one of my favorite "Haunts" in for Great Antiques, is opening in their NEW location in Monroe, Washington tomorrow! I won't get to check it out till Monday,,,,,but I wish ALL of them the BEST for their NEW location opening tomorrow!
The new South African flag is perceived to symbolize the destruction or defacement of the old Transvaal Vierkleur.
With Queen Elizabeth and Princess Diana frequently in my life, the stage name “Fergie” for the nickname of the red haired (like me) Sarah, Duchess of York.
The first book I read about it was an academic take: The Mysterious Death of Mary Rogers: Sex and Culture in Nineteenth Century New York. And for an academic book, it was fairly approachable. But I didn’t finish it, which is rare for me. Two reasons. 1) The prose, which despite efforts to make the book comprehensible to ordinary humans, still included passages like this:
I wanted to take a minute to thank Summer from Sumo's Sweet Stuff for hosting a great giveaway for my shop a week or so ago. And if you went over there and entered, thank you for supporting me! And of course, I have to congratulate Maloree, who was the winner of the giveaway. She received a $15 gift certificate to my shop, and here are items she selected:
IBAN: ES58 210003254102001239-93
Every ones pal Ruthie, sent 2 kinds of shampoo
In 2006 at the San Diego Comic-Con I met Moebius. It was a once in a lifetime chance and one of my most cherished comic-con moments. I realized the importance and the rarity of my brief meeting. There I was, just some guy from Missouri meeting an art legend from France. Ah, the beauty of Comic-Con!
So, I signed up for Facebook to keep up with folks. Fair enough. I found it interesting to know when someone was going to the store, or brushing their teeth, or having a new child, or getting a new job. I also enjoyed seeing little tidbits of information they would throw out to the world, just for the hell of it. See, it’s the little things that make you feel like you’re more involved in someone’s life than you really are.
It is quite frankly really incredible this revelation! Having come to understand why I feel that way and what set it off I was able to change my emotional imprint. It took a lot of pressure off my shoulders. I was able to be intimate with my partner this very day without any fears or worries which has been a real struggle for me the past months.
"She'll not be scared of you," they told me
That maybe I’m not useless,
We facilitate your access to information and are an outlet for your ideas, concerns and challenges and this process should not be hampered by officials who choose the kind of information to which you have access.
Back on his pillow the soldier bends with curv’d neck and
Play it here:
I was originally recommended this book by Luisa Plaja when I held Sex in Teen Lit Month last year, and when I saw it at my Oxfam Bookshop a few weeks ago, I knew I had to buy it. Then I read Sophie’s review of Nobody’s Girl by Sarra Manning on So Many Books, So Little Time a few days ago, and liked the sound of that book so much, I decided to get on to reading Let’s Get Lost. I’m glad I did, it was such a great story!
Eddie: No.
Even within the confines of our Church, there are clear signs that slow and steady wins the race. Following the Second Vatican Council new movements and organizations sprouted and flowered based on divergent interpretations of the documents. Many religious congregations threw off conventionality and tradition and embraced the age. The Church, they stated, had thrown open the doors to reform, and the faithful in droves embraced the new and novel. Those heady days of reform have proven short-lived as their aging proponents slowly succumb to time and the demands of succeeding generations for Tradition, devotion, and orthodoxy. Congregations that embraced modernity are dying; only those embracing the truths as divested by the Magisterium thrive.
Again, Carter's creativity on the blues - a form he must have played literally thousands of times - is wonder to behold.
Accessories: Stickles on the Wings
I hate this place. It stinks and it's dirty and there's piss everywhere and needles and garbage and yesterday when I went for a run in the park I had to traverse a trail that had been completely covered in used toilet paper. I've been robbed at gunpoint here, just down the street from my apartment. San Francisco is expensive, and I'll never be able to afford to buy a home. The city government is corrupt, there's nowhere to park, the people are all fucking crazy, and don't even get me started about MUNI.
A rabble roused to bring out riot gear.
www.co.cumberland.nc.us/tax.asp
By about the age of 10 or 11, I had moved into the final phase of the Pickwick scene - the budget 'original artist' album. Slowly but surely, Pickwick had started to bolster this section of the label - picking up defunct albums from the back-catalogues of the major labels. It was around this time that I got completely obsessed with Elvis, but even then an LP was pretty expensive, and I struggled to buy much of his RCA material. Pickwicks re-issuing of Presley albums (often under their Hallmark label) was perfectly timed to meet my insatiable demand for 'the king', and I regularly trundled off to Woolworths with a pound note to purchase another addition.
Before he could speak, though the tributes all hurt,
That’s an osmotic pressure causing a flow of people in one direction. But another flow works in the opposite direction — Swedes (or, rather, “persons of Swedish background”) are leaving Sweden for Denmark. Swedes who actually want to work for a living will find wages in Denmark that are on average 30% higher than those at home. Not only that, there is more to buy in Denmark, and at a lower price.
This, The Letter, is for Future Cindy.
This graphic novel contains four individual issues of the comic, which is narrated by a goblin called Butterworth. The artwork is fantastic, and really brought the story itself to life. This would be a great book for older children who are looking for something creepy to read, but I also think anyone would enjoy it! I definitely did.
I can’t get discouraged though or I should say I won’t get discouraged. This will be the second time this month I’ve completely gone balls to wall and forgot I was on a mission to reclaim my life. I could curl up into the fetal position and throw the white flag but I won’t. I need to look myself in the mirror and ask myself, “how bad do you want this?” I need to fight for what I want. I got caught up in the moment and lost sight of the bigger picture but all I can do is start again. Below are some lyrics that I find can lend inspiration to any situation life has to offer. Courtesy of Martina McBride, In My Daughter’s Eyes.
Former Shin Bet security service chief Yuval Diskin accuses Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu and Defense Minister Ehud Barak of harboring dangerous messianic illusions. Diskin and former Mossad chief Meir Dagan, both of whom recently spoke out against an Israeli attack on Iranian nuclear facilities, show that even the accomplished one-time leaders of the Shin Bet and Mossad can end up making damaging comments. They will do anything – including undermining their original objective – to make it seem illegitimate for the country’s elected leaders to follow through on the mandate to rule that was bestowed upon them by the voters.
Yes, Chris was the last man standing on Team Christina last night. Christina, proud mama coach that she is, split her points straight down the line 50-50. Lindsey Pavao and Chris Mann are just so different, it really is impossible to compare the two. Both gave their best performances of the competition this week, going back to their roots (Chris with opera and Lindsey with a smooth guitar cover of Bon Iver’s ‘Skinny Love’). In the end, Chris really won over the audience, getting a great majority of the votes from Team Christina. When they announced his name, he seemed so utterly shocked, it was impossible to be mad at him for winning. It’s always great to see a performer with humility.
Tele prospecting benefit such as relationship on the subject of prices and additionally endorsing. Tele prospecting has gone preceding marketplace demand development. A great deal more explore should replace to make sure you business demonstrated takes along with the precise Tele prospecting. To make sure you boost all the e-mail, messaging and additionally information-exchange protection, created experimentations. To promote guide search engine optimization conducting studies is really an imperative. Promotional human resources will have to determine just for his or her self just how have the ability most of the take are probably. Subsequently after generate transformations certain times, the can realize that numerous subjection takes literally aren’t able and also approachable. Optimum skilled individual is normally promotional splitting to build a good version of patron centric endorsing messaging in which coronary heart entirely relating to the essential for the prospects. Valuable takings keep just by Tele prospecting.
**“Three Wooden Crosses”
mind you the french Dj talks between all songs and sometimes it affects the beginng of the song i tracked in general after he had (almost) shut up ! or in his words
1 superfluous
Terry Thornton of Hill Country of Monroe County, Mississippi writes in to tell Grave Mappers of a big problem in Oxford, Alabama. It seems that a 1500-year-old Indian mound is being destroyed so the city can use the dirt as landfill for a Sam's Club.
Kirk is a young, rich brat who doesn’t think of anyone but himself. To celebrate his twenty-first birthday, Kirk throws a big birthday bash at his father’s huge ranch house. As Kirk celebrates, he takes sexually-enhanced drug the rich enjoy called, Alantica Dream. During the party, Kirks enjoys overindulging in the company of many men, relishing in the pleasure of having orgasm after orgasm from his so-called friends. One moment Kirk is enjoying the party and the next, he wakes up in a cage with a uniquely looking red-headed, freckled man. Since any blemish is considered a flaw, Kirk has never seen such a captivating looking man before and he’s immediately intrigued by him. Kirk soon finds out he and the man, Lyndarum, are both to be sold as slaves, and he’s both confused and angered by this. To his dismay, the men who captured him do not believe he is THE Kirk Skelling and they treat him like they would any ordinary slave. But there is something about Lyndarum’s sweet and sexy disposition that Kirk feels an immediate connection with, so he quickly decides to do what he must to keep them both safe. Together. Despite how dire their situation looks, Kirk is determined to get both him and Lyndarum safely away from their captors so they can share a life and love that Kirk never knew he wanted to have until he met Lyndarum. Will they be able to escape captivity and achieve a life and love that both men crave so desperately?
In the word cloud below, a depiction of the frequency with which words crop up on Cheddar and Change, several themes are apparent.
This morning I checked the overnight/international e-mail. Hema Bharadwaj and I have been having an exchange about Ganesha, because Marty did his final project in an Eastern Religions class on how to set up an altar to Ganesha. Hema sent a link she liked about the origin of Ganesha and some regional variations and symbolism. The final paragraph is this:
I wish you all a very happy 2012--I hope it brings to you and your loved ones peace, hope, health, and prosperity. Thanks for stopping by, and for your comments--you guys are the best!
So when I read an article brought to my attention by Dances With Fat about how 54% of British docs in a recent poll said that non-emergency medical services should possibly be denied to people who smoke and people who are fat, I maybe wasn’t as surprised as some.
Okay - right now you’re probably accusing me of just being a sore ‘shipper’ – mad because the characters I actually liked didn’t get together. But that really isn’t it. Granted, maybe it is a little – but I’m looking at through through the lens of structuralism, which I’ve dealt with before.
Colie Collen, Editor in Chief
Consequently, it was God’s goodness that prompted Him to leave us this most precious jewel of His Body and Blood. With It, He has enriched and decorated His Church. In this Sacrament He remains with His Church to comfort her in tribulations, do defend her in time of danger, to encourage her for all good works, to enlarge her good desires, to make her burn with love for heavenly things, to make her disdain the things of the world, to incorporate her with Himself, to make her share in the sufferings and merits of His Passion, and to give her a sure pledge of eternal life.
Definite articles
...The darkness is so heavy that I can feel it. --Pg. 70 of an ARC of "Breaking Beautiful" by Jennifer Shaw Wolf
AMENDED VERIFICATION/CERTIFICATION
So, what is her story all about? Alice has responded to an online advert:
If I feel so inclined for a farther walk, I wouldn’t be surprised if I made a jaunt back into Brier Creek. The walks are pretty, just don’t ask me to live there.
...and in Scotland
even out in the yard
4. Groza IV 10:03
13) An affection for the TV show Firefly
“I’ve suspended the talks on the Illinois insurance exchange until the Supreme Court makes its decision, which we expect in June,” Rep. Frank Mautino (D- Spring Valley), who has been leading Illinois’ talks to set up the exchange, said.
Though a victim described the shooter as a white man, Jordan stopped short of calling the shootings hate crimes. He said while it's a logical theory that the shootings could have been racially motivated, there was no evidence Saturday afternoon to indicate that was the case.
The army of Chiweshe followed them and took cattle, sheep and goats and women. Then Chiweshe returned home. Chiweshe called his people and shared all the treasure which he had taken. At the end Chiweshe thanked Mhembere and gave him a woman called Manhando who had been captured. She was the daughter of Chivero. Her mutupo was Shava and her chidawo was Mwendamberi.
opaque and glinting
When the sun shines or even if it rains, I take this walk every morning on the way to work. Perhaps I gloat a little to people who drive or take the bus, but in fairness they usually give me a strange look when I mention that I walk, so I suppose everyone is happy to do their own thing.
Is it hormones, pain meds, just low blood glucose, tiredness, stress, unfitness etc etc. One school mum happen to have diabetes and I chatted to her the other day on how does she feel and know and experience diabetes? She recon she have heard people can suffer from a problem that's always just low blood glucose.
Can we not woo back old delights?
Quarles got away.
2013.E-VI/24/1966. On the shortsightedness of faculty indignation during a student sit-in. University of Chicago Maroon, Chicago, Illinois.
I often make many dishes using semiya and this biryani is one such and a big hit among my friends, also they have tried it out many times and told me that it has turned out perfect. This can be made as a substitute to rice and enjoyed during lunch or at dinner.
Hello & good morning to everyone.
during these difficult and ugly times that will grow us as an individual.
(And they accuse us of hate?!! Don't such people nauseate themselves with their hypocrisy?!)
Sis- "fuck ur point! u call rt now and say misunderstanding so she doesn't get fired or I'm completely done with you! she does not deserve to be fired! you tell me what time and day I can meet you at your bank to get my money!"
Another thing about the world of makeup artists is the sense of family and comaraderie. There can be fierce competition, to be sure, because makeup artistry can also be as much about the ego as it is about giving to someone else. The performance and cult of the artist is definitely part and parcel of this business.
This Pinoy superhero is an obvious combination of The Spirit, The Question, Mr. A (note: the fedora hat) and yes, Spider-Man (place Spidey’s chest on Gagamba’s face and you’ll get the picture).
It seems that Perdomo viewed “the Sun” that he was reaching for as a symbol for happiness or maybe success. He made his way to the sun, but somehow lost part of “himself”, which when paired with the title, “Everyone Left”, it points toward him losing a person(s) who was very important to him. This song carries the most weight on the record. Lyrically, it is very revealing. Personally, I think it shows a side of Perdomo that was never seen before. It shows that despite his ability to write love songs that many have found solace in, he is unable to help himself.
With regards to this, leader CL said “(I’m) very happy to have spent time up close and personal with the fans and also felt their passion.’
Think pray for release of terrible pain.
Quick as the proverbial flash, another screen pops up asking me to register with this, put card details into that, sign up with the other and check all manner of disclaimer boxes above which the typeface is so small that I wouldn’t have a clue as to what I was actually saying yes (or no) to.
Copyright 2011. All rights reserved. Peace Mennonite Church of Columbia, MO
The Mantras, Yo Mama’s Big Fat Booty Band, Seduction Sideshow
Two Coats
Flowers from Rachel at SFTIO. I love them! How cool are they?! Thanks Rachel!!
In the end, I walked away with a business card, a little networking, an idea for a possible future job, and a good feeling.
If our goal is to understand that life is all about making small sales on a regular basis, then our end result is to get people to buy whatever it is we are selling. Whatever it is you sell it all relies on the same impulsive responses that most people on earth would understand. If you are keeping up with the principles to this point, you should now find yourself able to consistently put yourself in front of people who are at least willing to listen to what you have to say.
This technological millennia is quite awesome for the fact that shelters and humane societies put pictures of their adoptables online. Knowing myself and that it would be nearly impossible to leave the shelter with out a pet, this was a life saver. I resolved not visit a shelter until there was a specific dog I wanted to pursue. 10 months later, there was. Shelby was an adorable white 8-year-old Jack Russell with one black patch over her eye, and I was ready to meet her. (I know what you’re thinking: Jordan, that is not a description of the dog in the picture above.)
Due to my youth and inexperience at the time of my birth I was rudely excluded from the decision making process as to where I would be raised. Apparently since my parents were already in Liberia they thought; “What the Hell, we’ll raise the little blighter here.” So it came to pass.
Dorsey was on the road working with our distributor in Biloxi for the Top of the Hops festival coming up on the 28th of February. Byron was draping theneck hangers on bottles of our Courir de Mardi Gras beer. These hangers allow for the free download of two songs from the Valcour website. Cory had been working away on some new packaging changes for some of our core brands, plus starting work on the next – way too cool, and top-secret seasonal.
Add cinnamon and melted butter and pulse until combined and the mixture resembles wet sand. Press mixture into a 9 inch pie plate. Bake for 8-10 minutes, or until fragrant.
- A National Population Registry keeps track of “every single individual who comprises the population of the country,” and verifies each individual’s identity. (Articles 85 and 86)
Char Koay Teow, Chee Cheong Fun, Leng Chee Kang & Si Ham, Gurney Drive Hawker Centre – How would you judge which stall serves the better food? By the people queuing in front of the stall? Yes? From my experience at Gurney Drive Hawker Centre, it is proven that the answer is a NO! The CKT we ordered from this particular stall which had a snake-long queue turned out to be a disappointment! The noodles were soggy, the taste was nothing exceptional… I was a tad frustrated because it wasted my stomach quota -_- The chee cheong fun on the other hand was ok, but we were expecting pure hae gor (prawn paste) instead of hae gor mixed with sweet sauce. Thus far, the food we had was far from impressive. I though just maybe, food luck was not with us that night. But wait! Si ham was coming to the rescue! The picture above speaks for itself. It was clean and big in size. The only thing you can’t see in the picture is how bloody fresh it was! I couldn’t help but ate half of those.
What happened after that I'm not sure I even want to commit to writing. The kids were appalling. Xavier was overwhelmed with all the people there but was better once we allowed him to sit on the floor in the corner and play with the iPad, but Stella was in fine form. She screamed, she threw food, she threw herself around, she was embarrassing. She had to be taken outside at least twice by Adam and Grandma. I watched the colour drain from the brides face as she clearly could think of nothing other than what the hell would she do if they did THIS at the wedding. All the while, her nieces, who are of similar age, sat quietly and behaved perfectly, unintentionally making my 2 seem even worse.
Shirt: Kohls
"Great, I want him to come to my room to see my baby," I said.
On view March 31 through August 19, 2012, in OMCA's Great Hall, The 1968 Exhibit was developed by the Minnesota History Center, in partnership with the Atlanta History Center,
Look at the fantastically awesome antique wood crate purchased yesterday at my neighborhood Hillcrest Junk Company (click here to see). I attached it to the rear of my grocery- store- run Purple Cruiser. Until my new one arrives, this bike will have to suffice.
Micah - by hugging
I also attended another panel of Imaginary Friends which isn’t as interesting as Studio 4°C one but it did leave quite an impression for me where I felt like listening to more of such experience. With that, the thing I really anticipate for subsequent AFA is actually the panels and interview of industry guest.
Yes and no. Back when I was writing what became Fools Errant, the first—though I didn’t know it at the time—Archonate story, I put in a mention of how the universe periodically alternated between rationalism and magic as its fundamental operating principle. At the time, I was interested in how Isaac Newton had started out as a full-weight medieval alchemist but then switched mid-career to rationalism and became essentially the founder of the Enlightenment. It was as if the rules of the game had abuptly switched one day, and he had stepped off one wave and onto the other without missing a beat.
And that, dear reader, is the good news!
Quick nature note: indigo bunting, eastern goldfinch and the first fireflies of the season!
Another warning, if you get Arcueids 'true' end, and do not cry a little, you have no heart.
11. Life of the Party 5.05 (42/79)
It's a few days of sensory overload at the moment, with the Trashed Organ Fringe event in full swing. It was also mentioned in the Guardian on Tuesday, where it features as part of the wider Festival of Belonging.
I felt the tears tickling my bottom eyelids........
JCK's luck held. No mention of the "F word" came up during the stay at her mother's. BOY was so distracted by Christmas itself, and with a houseful of cousins and fun activities with his grandparents, that the word burning a fiery hell hole in JCK's stomach didn't come up.
Let’s have a looksie at all the fun pink rooms I found!
Just a random, 7 hour, 4 minutes cover/version
I’ve added two photos, but neither are great. As you can imagine the light isn’t great at 1:30am, but seeing as I made the card I thought I would blog it now before I forget.
Anncoo's recipe says to let it sit for 20 minutes, but I decided to let it sit for much longer while I made the lotus paste. I might also add that if you have any doubts about whether your tap water is alkaline and don't want to do a litmus test, add 1 Tsp baking soda to the water.
Maria was sad not to be allowed to enter the comp but she has now been given the job of DT and blog coordinator of our new SIMPLY SASSY blog which will be live in January. I think she's a bit excited LOL.
Bainbridge Island, my hometown, which sources lots of local
HB 2094 has gone to bill heaven. We made it much further this year in our attempt to allow you to visit Texas craft breweries and leave with samples of our brews. We had strong support from the public, the press, our largest distributor and many legislators including Jessica Farrar who sponsored the bill. Unfortunately all of that and logic were not enough to overcome the opposition of one distributor group. But we plan on trying again next session. The trend is positive. And many thanks to you for writing your state elected officials. You showed the legislature that people care about this issue.
- Sid James died last year;
Yes, well it appears someone leaked the members list.
All the new entrants have the 4×4 style, adequate – not MPV – versatility in the dimensions of a Ford Focus. This makes them strong contenders as cars to suit people’s lifestyles.
Kay Halliwell-Sutton from IndigoBlu Stamps will be demonstrating at Craft Den Studio on
For years writing was my secret. Journals filled with my barely legible scrawl. Hours spent crafting an email. Handwritten letters to a childhood friend.
"You know", I started, "It's interesting but it seems like lately I'm not quite sure what gender people are perceiving me as".
And yet the menace of the years
Say your mine
to run back to them. Run back to being held captive instead of being
Here in the UK and many other parts of the world, mid-November becomes a time to remember our war-dead by pinning a poppy on to our clothing. (Apparently the British Legion send 3 million of them around the globe and sell upwards of 45 million in the UK, earning the charity around £40M)
For Darkness Shows the Stars by Diana Peterfreund
Cook pasta according to directions to al dente. While the pasta is cooking, sauté onion and garlic in olive oil until tender. Add the canned tomatoes and paste. Add the herbs, salt, and pepper. Cook on medium low to let flavors blend. Turn down to low.
Trent burned his hand on mommy's curling iron last week. :( we were in Beaumont so we went to a care facility. He has second degree burns on several parts of his left hand. I felt awful from the moment it happened. He's just so curious and he wanted to see the curling iron. I hadn't pulled the bathroom door all the way closed. I'm usually so careful with the curling iron and very good at keeping him away from it.
Mungo's Hi Fi ft YT - Precious Diamond
But, the truth is, He directed this. I know He did, and I'm going to have to be vigilant about praying for peace with this role and praying for fulfillment. Today, I admit, it's not here yet, but I trust God that He will bring it in time.
Anyway, my favorite thing this week is a song.
Anyway, the good thing is that they sell also other brands, which are English brands, and that means beautiful and cheap polish. I'm talking about W7 and Barry M. polishes.
* Begin making the icing when the cake comes out of the oven. By the time the icing is ready, the cake will be cool enough to ice. You don't want the cake piping hot, but you don't want it completely cooled either. The icing spreads more readily if the cake is still warm.
Most comfortable dish & easy to make best served with rice. It taste simply delicious. I serve this curry with potato methi fry & pickle. This can be prepared with or without vegetables. Ladies finger & yam is most commonly used vegetables for this preparation. Thick & creamy in hot spicy powder garnished with Indian seasonings makes this curry a signature dish in my house.
Complete the following in the least amount of sets possible:
Any way you clean your carpets, fact is that a residue get left behind. You may precondition your carpet with expensive products, use alkaline rinses or even acids and water rinses, no matter what… you will end up with some residue. But these too can be taken care of. The common kinds of residues are alkaline, acid, neutral, water and compound based residue.
“We will continue to ensure that we take in immigrants who are of good quality and able to integrate well into our society.”
Next – purchasing publicity
leave the country completely wrecked and tens of thousands of US “military advisors” and “defence contractors” still in place. We can close Gitmo, only, er, no, we can’t, not really. We can get Bin Laden – in the middle of a country we still call our most important regional ally, which has been sheltering him for years. We can deal with Wall Street and the banks – by letting them more or less carry on the way they were going before they wrecked everything in the first place. We can deal with national and private debt … well, we could … maybe … but Congress won’t let us.
So now the government can force us into slavery
Today is Earth Day 2012!
We cuddled in his backyard until it was time for me to go home. There were still people at his house, but he wanted to drive me home anyways. When we pulled into my driveway and he turned off his car. We just sat in the front seat and cuddled. We talked for two hours. It felt really good to just be with him. Suddenly, my parents came home and I freaked out.
South Africa is the canary in the Globalist coal mine.
Ok, I'm showing my lack of knowledge in American (or world) history here. I don't really have a historical figure that I admire (not that they're unadmirable). I admire my grandparents, my parents, my sister, and of course my husband! They're all the inspiration a girl could need!
Many of you today feel betrayed. Some of you have so often felt betrayed that you have deep scars on your soul. If you have been betrayed, then understand this sermon touches on those events in which you were betrayed.
Bra tops and garters….naw…gotta leave sumting to the imagination. Plus that’s jus not me.
Clearly, companies that want to exceed their customers’ expectations first need to select people who actually care about people – enough to read verbal and nonverbal cues; train people in deep listening for better understanding; and, reward people for genuine behavior that keeps customers coming back and spreading good experiences across the ‘Net.
Anyway, today has already had one lot of baking, and I am proud to say I have only had ONE cupcake!
And a Team McCann press release with slight variations
6. Denver the last Dinosaur- “Denver the last Dinosaur, he’s your friend and a whole lot more”
Use as many My Pink Stamper stamps from any set(s) on ONE project. It can be a card, scrapbook page or mini book.
At 7 I was wondering what time it is – need to get a clock in the spare bedroom – so I got up.
Now, in the examples above, I am sure that you notices that the shutter speed changed. There is a ratio between the shutter speed and the f/stops which we need to explore. Do you remember that I said that each time you step your f/stop down by one stop, you effectively cut the amount of light reaching the film/sensor by half? Therefore, to ensure that the exposure remains the same, one needs to double the amount of time the light travels through the stopped-down lens and hits the film or sensor surface.
yep. knees pulling together in a triangle…and. there. he. goes.
I wrote this Friday but couldn’t post til now.
LCBO#: 467662
Both those floating ghost-like
Just don’t run around saying that one death is more important than another. Don’t demand more attention for one person like the other doesn’t deserve it because of their failures in life. Everyone has done something in their life that other people wouldn’t approve of. That’s not the point.
When I said I'd made a root beer cake, the looks at home could only be described as nonplussed. If I had described it as a dark spice cake or a moist cousin of German lebkuchen, the initial response might've been more enthusiastic. Turns out that the cake is very much like a spice cake, spiked with star anise, cardamom, nutmeg, lemons, and pepper. The top is covered with with spiced glaze flavored with some of the same spices.
The second part develops a dynamic Computable General Equilibrium model of the Mexican economy, paying attention to the energy sector and its linkages with other aspects of the aggregate economy. Conclusions for Mexico are placed in the wider context of the Americas. The effects of climate change policy are contrasted with that in Venezuela, Argentina and Brazil. Finally, by employing an integrated US-Mexican model the authors look at possible advantages of emissions trading between these two countries.
Today the US Secretary of Defence, Leon Panetta, said that "the dream of an independent and sovereign Iraq is now a reality".
After so many years in apartment living, and not having a seperate dining area, I am so ready to have the most beautiful dining area to entertain guests in.
She owns a little white Westie, who on two occasions has proceeded to urinate on her very own leg when I have stopped to talk with her. She waves her hand back at me through the gathering strength of the wind and then proceeds with her little one on her own way.
This will be the title of my next book, coming out later this year-2011. If you enjoyed my first book, ‘THE SECRET POWER OF GODLY WISDOM TO COMPLETELY TRANSFORM YOUR LIFE,” then I know you will enjoy this one as well.
Minerality on the palate, slightly oily with good mouthfeel backed up by just enough clean acidity.
I think Pa Cartwright handled things better than Lieutenant Castillo.
Since I woke up with a hard-on, I pressed it into my partner’s back, and woke her up. We fucked, hard, for about ten minutes. I like wake-up sex, and so does she. I didn’t tell her about Karla, and her red swollen pussy lips, because she is also friends with Karla on Facebook. We’re both friends with Karla’s fiance too.
Now, this guy could have been a head chef anywhere in the world, and I mean anywhere, yes, even in France!!
We have turned a blind eye to many of your various misdemeanours and refused to label you as followers of a religion of war even after you blew us up in the name of Allah.
Like the comic books, music and movies of the 1960s, television was very much a part of my childhood, and Dark Shadows was one show that left a distinct and lasting impression on me. The series had a lot in common with the comic books I absorbed, mainly the serialized adventures of the Marvel heroes. The trials and tribulations of characters such as Peter Parker or Ben Grimm were not very different from the struggles of Barnabas Collins as portrayed by Jonathan Frid,. Like the Marvel heroes, Barnabas was given special "powers" but he didn't want to have them, and didn't revel in his vampire role. To him it was a curse, and he only wanted to live like a normal person. These type of characters greatly appealed to me.
Eschewing the prevailing realism and humanistic trappings of his peers, tinged with more than a whiff of nostalgia, Kim pursued a boldly expressionistic approach that transcended conventional morality, where raw human passions are laid bare and quaint notions of romantic love are put to rest. Perhaps this is nowhere better illustrated than in comparing the female characters in Han Hyung-mo’s films—by turns adventurous, headstrong and idealistic—to those of Kim’s—manipulative, libidinous and cannabilistic. It is equally impossible to imagine one of Han’s characters drugging her husband and having him undergo a vasectomy (The Insect Woman, 1972), or performing necrophilia on the corpse of her lover (Iodo, 1977), as Kim’s do.
Soft Cream Filling:
$110-150k a year, stays the same
Turquoise is rare and very valuable. ( is a combination of copper and aluminium, with the chemical formula CuAl6(PO4)4(OH)8·4H2O with a Mohs hardness of 5.9)
passes by the scattered sketches.
Percy Heath (bass)
Let both mixtures (the soapy water and the beeswax/coconut mix) reach around 60 degrees Centigrade (I am not sure if this is critical...I usually make sure that any mixes are at the same temperature...).
I hope you can see from these photos that I had an AMAZING time in New Jersey! I haven't loaded photos from my 'real' camera yet but I did take several so I can hopefully scrapbook some of them! (I had captions for these, but blogger is fighting with me and I have too much to do today to fight with it... sorry!)
Step 3: Unpack boxes. While you do so, have an idea: you can remove those cobwebs from the ceiling by Swiffering it! Begin immediately. Stop after three minutes, put away the Swiffer, get a chair to stand on, and begin removing cottony Swiffer bits from your ceiling. Unpack more boxes.
And according to him, that first step was even before he physically took the first step. It was something we might overlook. It doesn’t seem like much. It was just a small thing. He said, “The most important step was setting a date and telling people.”
So, pair number 1 had broken the unspoken, Mormon rules by not calling back promptly and they were immediately crossed off the list. We moved on to duo number 2. I was totally okay with this because, truth be told, I was way more into pair number 2. I mean, they were Latino and ADORABLE. Guy 1 was a brown haired Colombian with glasses who looked like Gael Garcia Bernal and Guy 2 was a blonde haired Spaniard who looked like a young Leonardo DiCaprio. What could go wrong?
A violet monster attached itself to Abby's ankle as she dove over the horde and landed in a somersault. She didn't land on both feet, but stretched the leg out that the critter clung to and smacked it on the cement floor. It squeaked, but didn't let go. It gave two others the opportunity to jump on Abby's back.
In its just-released Environmental Justice Strategy document, the DHS says the idea is to “include environmental justice practices in our larger mission efforts involving federal law enforcement and emergency response activities” and to incorporate environmental justice in “securing the homeland.” Roll that around in your head for awhile:
Before you run off to wish them well, let's talk challenge
3. They’re so big that… you just love to hate them.
Hi, I’m An Alcoholic
Guide to Bank Robbery - Rule #1: Make sure your getaway car is big enough to carry away your stolen goods.
There’s the readers to fear. Every writer wants readers, right? They want to reach out to the world, touch others, change people’s lives with their stories. But that potentially includes everyone you’ve ever met. Your exes. The bitchy girls at school. Your old headmistress (gulp). Your secret crush. And, of course, lots of random stupid people who won’t get your book, won’t believe your premise and won’t like your characters. Suddenly the prospect of Rowlingesque sales is horrifying and you pray for hopeless obscurity. Hmm. Toughen up. Don’t worry about it. Identify your worst reader fear - yes, your mother - and give her the manuscript. It won’t be as bad as you think. And if it is…well, at least it’ll be over. No other reader will feel so frightening.
“You remembered?”
And I hate to say this but I have my trusty iPad and camera and will be posting lots more photos.
Is, as I reconsider, such a one.
Last month Kena López Moreno from Mexico was raped in Cafayate.
May 2010 bring you and your family many blessings! God bless!
Stay socially active. Being single means you probably need to make a bit more of an effort to socialize. Find friends at work or through activities you enjoy. Keep doing new things. Remember that being single, even choosing to remain single, doesn’t mean you can’t have romantic relationships in your life.
The tall Icelandic man that plays under the alias Bang Gang is just as diverse as the northern country itself. Bardi Johannsson’s cohesion between his soft acoustic melodies and his daring electronica explorations directly reflect the contrasting landscapes of his native land; where lustrous geysers and incautious volcanoes live enharmonic with one another. Bang Gang’s 2000 début, "You", was met with great fanfare and critical revelry, while the follow-up, 2003’s "Something Wrong", cemented his artistic and commercial success. Bang Gang’s third full-length, "Ghosts from the Past", is currently being released in various markets worldwide and is, according to early reviews, already a strong contender for album of the year.
At dinner with a few friends, an interesting discussion came up. A woman in a senior position is often more aggressive than a male counterpart. Successful career women generally sit and cross their legs like a guy. A woman has to work more hours to prove herself than a male counterpart. Women have had to change the way they look, think, speak and behave to fit in.
The same ridiculous comments were echoed by Sen. Kelly Ayotte from Maine. Each has “pooh poohed” the suggestion that women are overly concerned with the issue of contraception but instead are more focused on the economy. As if each were separate from the other.
06 Mangoes (Wayne, Libby) 05:33
This big-hearted friend, bless her soul, helped me lug the monstrous table the long six blocks home. We had to rest every five driveways, and crossing the one busy street was a heart-pounding experience. The plywood and broken-mosaic tabletop ended up in the dump, but those shapely wooden legs were a true find.
SHD: OK, OK, the problem is linked to the media . If we had radio stations who'd really dare to play good music, the scene would improve . Please remember that there are only 250,000 people living on this reef, so we should be thankful that there is so much going on.
I have spent a number of years studying the Song of Solomon, and just recently have felt compelled to delve into it once more, on a deeper level. I believe this little book is one of the most mysterious and perhaps misunderstood of all the books of the Bible. But in all the mystery there lies a truth that runs throughout the pages….we have a beautiful Bridegroom who loves us; and whom, as we come to know Him, stirs our heart to love Him back.
In the mental checklist that I went through before allowing him to go into the store alone, it never really crossed my mind that a store employee would be concerned about him buying a gallon of milk by himself. My son is ten. He is not a small ten, either; I am taller than him by only about 3 or 4 inches. He could not possibly have been mistaken for a 6 or 7 year old, an age which would justifiably raise some concern about a child alone.
I have my own pet theory about the stereotype of men dragging their feet about getting married. The socio-biologists claim that men want to invest their seed in as many women as possible, and therefore do not want marriage. I think this is only a dim shadow of the whole truth. The whole truth must include this great fact about men: They are capable of heroic loyalty. When men finally do marry, they are capable of committing themselves to the care of their wives and children. Many men spend a lifetime working at jobs they don’t like very much, for the love of their families. When men marry, they take it very seriously. It is women who initiate most divorces. It is divorced men who commit suicide at twice the rate as married men, while divorce has little impact on the suicide propensities of women.
... Hmm, some of you may be wondering. If all of this is so standard and so healthy and so fine, how come there is such hullabaloo about mixing? Mixes are uses of several languages in one utterance or, more generally, in a communicative exchange. They’re sometimes called codeswitches, codemixes, blends. “Mix” is a neater word, I find. I also wonder quite a lot about the mix fuss, so I propose to talk about it in my next post.
45The Lord kept faith with the house of Israel about all the good which he said he would do for them, and all his words came true.
Good Morning! I would like to share with you a card I made for a friend's son's birthday, who will be turning 16 this month!! I used the Kenny K image, Golfer from the All Stars collection and colored him with marker.
My hypothesis – in a nutshell – is that Philip is more like the romantic hero ‘man’ in the beginning, goes through the transformation into a French … I don’t know what, those were the parts you could skip the dialogue because pages would be spent on stockings and ribbons and fabric … and Cleone realizes that she doesn’t want a little French doll, but the Philip that she knew before – the ‘romantic hero’ with un-powdered hair and what not.
- Free gifts with certain fragrance purchases (please check in store).
Scary stuff. I've been doing this for a decade with my children.
NOTE: By entering this contest you agree that your submission photos/descriptions may be used in the gallery or as a monthly highlighted customer project on the EvaDress web site.
It’s cool shiz. I’m glad they like me, even when I don’t blog. My life would be very boring otherwise.
FINALLY the doors open and I'm not in this race like other people are. Silly people I say! But once inside I realize why they rushed. I am not at the END of the customer service line and looking at about 7 other people in front of me.
Regulations should facilitate economic growth and help businesses comply.
A promise is always special whether it be between a brother and sister, or to show care and affection to any family member or treasured friend. This lead me to think about how I could participate in this beautiful ceremony. Sometimes the bond of friendship, with a true friend, is like that of a sibling. And couldn't we all do with a bit of protection?
Years ago, while taking a poetry class in college, my professor asked me to share with the class my process in writing poetry. I was one of her favorite student writers and I think she assumed that it was something that I really worked at and had a process for. I’m pretty sure I disappointed her.
Now I’m no longer alone
“I’ve already told you,” he growled. “You’re my mate and I’ve come to take you back.”
Newman’s Own Salad Dressing $0.50/1
As those of you who know me know, Ron Paul is the only person running whom I can vote for in good conscience. Many well meaning friends have asked me with imploring looks and hands wrung, “But what if he doesn’t win the nomination….you’ll still vote for Romney right, because we can’t let Obama win?”
Because my laundry room is right off my kitchen I thought I would store my aprons in here. The cutest and my favorite apron (blue polka dots) was made for me by my younger brother.
Sciences at de l’Industrie – This fun, hands-on science museum attracts 2.5 million visitors each year, with its cool exhibits on anatomy, biology, you name it.
I have no idea how ya'll link things so neatly, so I just copied this article from the International Herald Tribune...seemed appropriate...
And to just believe in the magic of Santa ...
Another semester of Journey Groups is coming to a close. This time around has been especially sweet for me. I have deeply enjoyed connecting with women in my own church body and I am beginning to see the start of some new, deep friendships.
Near the end of the flight, I saw the moon set. The moon by this time was at the horizon, and as it was slipping below it, all sorts of light refraction effects were happening. First the crecent changed from being circular to more angular with two vertical ends attached to a flattening horizontal line, till only the stright horizontal line was left, which itself winked out of view. Unforgettable. A MoonSet , seen for the first time.
Her lips still tingled where Zane’s had been mere moments before. Dazed, and highly aroused she ducked under his arm to enter the chamber. Isabelle sat on the edge of the bed, staring at nothing, memorizing every touch, every taste. She had never been so turned on in her entire life. With Jake, she had never reached an orgasm. Not once. Not even when he went down on her. Jake apparently had no problem so it had to have been her. That was part of his reasoning of why he cheated.
The Somme and the trauma it instilled in the men who fought there led to some of the most graphic of the war poems, written by poets like Sassoon and Owen. A couple of the ones I find more memorable, and most moving, are:
5. Bush get ears and dutty get tongue. Sometimes you think that what you do or say nobody sees or hears, but yet your secrets are known.
She’ll ignore the fact that she needs to keep these nightly ghost walks with her pet rottweiler a secret. No one would really understand…
American novel. It does not compel the reader to toss pages like coins, nor does
with the white lace collar.
That's right . . . it's a Christmas card!!! My FIRST of 2012! Aren't you so impressed? Here I am, Queen of procrastination . . . and it's only May and I have one whole Christmas card made. Sheesh, when I say it like that, it doesn't sound all that impressive, does it?! LOL! Here's a quasi - side view . . .
Our government welcomes them and says that they have left their dangerous and violent lands behind them, and that is true, however, it is not a location which causes people to act with violence, it is not soil which creates a propensity for crime, it is culture and mindset and those two travel with the migrant.
As soon as I could afford them I bought the Warhammer Fantasy boxed set (complete with card cut outs of Grom & Eltharion, I still use the High Elf Spearmen & archers), then the best thing (in my mind) ever happened. GW released "Warhammer 40k" in a boxed set, complete with Marines & Orks & Gretchin.
i spent most of Tuesday morning dropping of resumes in Leura & Katoomba, i dont know how successful this will be but you have to get out there & try.
Asgard 9 year box set.
various flash cards from the Dollar Spot at Target
I took note of the time and my reactions at various points. These are a few:
Here's the thing. Now I feel horrible for saying "I am so slow". I am NOT slow, I mean my 12 minute mile puts me pretty much in the middle of the pack of most races
I also referenced a crazy experiment where a scientist conducts the Schrödinger’s cat experiment on themselves. This is just suicidal, because in almost every single instance, the scientist will be killed, but in one of the multiverses, he will survive. In this lucky universe, the scientist will survive and live to fight another day and to research more stuff in particle physics. In the other universes however, there will be much mourning for the gallant scientist who chanced his life for science, and will be forever more wondering, “Was there another universe out there with ‘the scientist that lived’”. The only proof for the multiverse so far, other than disturbances in the CMBR, is that experiment. Proof would be a living scientist, and a dead scientist proves nothing.
2) We now have a family tartan!! If you’ll remember my kilt woes then you understand how much I wanted this special element of his culture to be incorporated into the wedding. I picture us passing down the tartan from generation to generation, and it’s my way of embracing his country and it’s traditions (which isn’t always easy with us living in the US).
This is an oldish favourite of mine that I originally discovered through the 1992 film, starring Miranda Richardson and Josie Lawrence, and that I was prompted into re-reading by a blog post at Iris on Books about another of von Arnim's novels, The Solitary Summer
- 6 sheets of roasted seaweed
no more tomorrows
With the mixer still on low speed, pour in a small amount of the syrup, away from the whisk so the hot syrup doesn’t splash. Continue to add the syrup in a thin stream; when all the syrup has been added, raise the speed to medium-high. Continue to whisk until the meringue has cooled to room temperature and stiff peaks form.
John Medd,
Healthier Eating.
This week is a little weird schedule wise, with tomorrow being a mostly work at home day (usually I am at a client's office), so the week begins with a little space I hope to fill with workwork and with some katework too-- I am aching to reconnect with my creative sides.
I am putting out a call of vigilance to help (in any way, according to our talents) the people in the Middle East and North Africa, who are peacefully protesting for freedom. Personal dignity and self-determination are basic human rights.
I am pretty attached already to that little bugger. I love the way his stretches look like interpretive dance. I love the way he sticks his tongue out of his mouth whenever he's pooping (a very handy indicator, I might add). I love the way he stares at me with his big blue eyes like I'm a total loser. You know the look I mean, the one where the one eyebrow is raised, and the mouth is kinda twisty?(He already has superiority complex, but with those caliber parents, who can blame him?)
They are so funny to watch when we let them out into the garden...they line up and scrat in time.....it's like watching chicken can-can lol and Milly (the smallest) is so good at finding worms and when she finds a worm the other two chase her around the garden trying to get it off of her....they've got no chance....Milly is so fast!
“There is no specific threat and all we are doing is having in place what we would describe as prudent and appropriate measures in place, in order that we could react if required in a timely and appropriate fashion.”
I’ve been struggling for a while now on ways to prove myself at work. I want to feel more worthy of my position and I want to be given more responsibility. However since everything within the maintenance department is so filled with chaos it’s difficult to make progress.
- Create several fundraising opportunities across Australia
Forgoing drums and guitars of a usual rock show - even a progressive rock show like Gabriel's, the distinguished artist instead implemented the 46-piece New Blood Orchestra. In doing so, he "re-imagined" some of his best known songs with awe-inspiring orchestral arrangements.
Obama is also young, inexperienced, and what experience he has is a few years as a senator and a few more as a member of the Illinois state house. As my liberal Colorado friend says, that qualifies him membership in the world's greatest debating club, but it doesn't identify whether he has the credentials to be President. He's never held office as a mayor, governor, or any other political job that could be considered a sort of minor league proving ground for the presidency. So that begs the question: is he a modern day Abraham Lincoln, an erstwhile Harry Truman, or is he the next Jimmy Carter?
I didn't learn to fight until I got married, but even then I often fell back on my earlier coping tactics. Giving in to maintain the peace or protect my children.
Paul McKeever, chairman of the federation, said: 'I find it alarming that there is no tangible evidence that even suggests, let alone proves, the value brought by "civilianising" increasing numbers of police posts.
And sometimes I will walk on the clouds as well. Nice thought”.
It’s been known to happen on occasion, but because my parents wouldn’t buy a gaming system for my brother and I when we were little I somehow manage to suck, but on very rare occasions pull of brilliant moves.
Today Mr5 started school. My baby has morphed into a Big Boy. Big shoes, big shorts, big hat.
Ageing concerns each and every one of us – whether young or old, male or female, rich or poor – no matter where we live. And it is possible to feel young and have fun at any age.
63. Slow, pokey drivers, drives me crazy. Why do you have to look 4 times before crossing the intersection????
My brain seems to have stopped functioning. My attorney husband would say that’s assuming a fact not in evidence. How about a few cartoons?
all four candles are lit.
Published by David and Charles
Fair enough. So, teens who make good choices keep themselves safe.
FOR THE RED PEPPER LAYER:
Iron Stylus: I’ll be there.
One of the most wonderful things about the BFG is his fancy for collecting dreams. In the book, dreams are presented as something alive and pulsing. Hearing about the sorts of dreams the BFG collects - and his ability to mix them together like the ingredients of a recipe - was an enjoyment in itself.
As the Gun Blogger Unite this month in Reno Nevada, MidwayUSA would like to extend our special appreciation for what they accomplish in shooting industry. First, we would like for each Blogger to receive a special gift from MidwayUSA when they arrive at the Rendezvous. Second, we would like to extend some exclusive discounts for each of the Bloggers and their respected communities/following to take advantage of. We hope these exclusive discounts help as many people and Bloggers as possible to enjoy the shooting sports industry.
But the places that used to fit me
I really don't know what to do with this information. I don't want to confront her because I wouldn't want to be confronted myself. I mean, what is there to do? We all know that there is no getting better if we are not ready to get better.
I forgot to take photos of the barbecue buffet and I didn’t have room for the sliders, but I did stop to admire the gorgeous jewel-toned floral arrangements by Perfect Presentations.
Roosevelt fostered competition to gather intelligence and expose the decisions he had to make.
Wishing you all a Happy Easter weekend.
Ok, ok, don’t forget to add the chloride, because it has the highest electron affinity, and the third highest electronegativity of all the elements, so it’s a great oxydizing agent. Hey, get this, humans can keep supplying themselves with it by using table salt. Chlorine has an atomic number of 17, and is the second most abundant halogen and the 21st most abundant chemical element in the Earth’s crust. We can make lots and lots of humans this way. But here’s the kicker, the paradox is that while elemental cholorine is extremely dangeous and poisinous in all lifeforms, we’ll make choloride necessary to the human in the form of chloride ions. Cute, huh?
1997- Geri’s Game
My sister visited our father in Spain a number of years ago, and he recounts a hilarious incident to me. He and Margaret were in the pub and they overheard a fellow talking about being a wrestling champion. My sister approached the man and challenged him to a fight. He kept refusing and my sister kept insisting. My father says he turned away for a second then looked again, and Margaret had the man pinned down on the floor. How humiliating that must have been for the champion!
I’ve tried spraying with water to dislodge them and then with soapy water to deter them. Both only lasted a few days to a week.
Likewise, anyone who draws attention to the multiple disadvantages of the un-managable levels of immigration, or shines the light of truth onto the lies we have been told is immediately condemned as the most vile of racists.
1 3/4 cups granulated sugar
Braking is considered heavy at Bahrain and although brakes are less susceptible to ambient heat, they will demand larger ducts to cope with the slow down from 300kph off the main straight with a 5g deceleration into the first turn. Additionally the new in field section will not allow the brakes to cool as much around the lap.
Anyway, I made it back to work early the next morning and was late by about 10 minutes and guess who was there to receive me in the kitchen?
I don't have time to look up projections and scouting reports and calendars of 2016. I'm a busy guy, you know.
There could not be a more perfect trend for spring. Florals are everywhere, they can be sweet and feminine or, if styled correctly, edgy. Prabal Gurung, Lela Rose and Altuzarra all used floral prints in interesting ways. In order to tone down the print, they used neutral colours. The looks are bold but beautiful.
Naturally, this set off a firestorm of controversy.
Today I am happy to announce that I will be attending the University of South Florida in pursuit of a Master’s Degree in Medical Sciences: Athletic Training Concentration. This program is mostly online with a 5-day trip to Tampa next summer (2013) and specializes in pediatric sports medicine. I cannot wait to begin as it begins a new journey in my professional development. Meanwhile, this will also allow me to remain with Monroe Physical Therapy and Sports Medicine and working with the student-athletes at Freeburg Community High School.
Soon, the waiting area on the fourth floor filled with a few people who came to share our big day. My cousin Julie and baby came, plus Tish, Jean, Jack & Sharon, the CASA worker Ann, and the adoption caseworker Jennifer. I was happy to see Sonya and Susan, the kids’ foster caseworkers whom had we worked with for over a year. We talked and laughed and took pictures while we waited.
Wood and lacquer antique Japanese owan bowl. The bowl and lid are finished with lacquer and decorated with gold maki-e art. The bowl is in good condition with no cracks though the lacquer is a bit worn in places along the lip and there are some small marks and scratches from handling as well as a slightly darkened patina of age.
Bag mixed Flowers.
We are excited by the photo-editing fun we have already brought to Google products, like Google+, where you can find many of your favorite Picnik effects in Creative Kit. We encourage you to visit Google+ andgive it a whirl.
Sonshine and I started watching Planet Earth with Richard Hammond (mother hates him: ' Why is that little man on EVERYTHING?' and had to give up near the end with a film about poaching elephants (much worse than poaching eggs). The tears and snotters started with the first appearance of the starving little lion cup....got progressively louder and hotter at the shivering little black bears up a tree in North America somewhere...and when the elephant calf disappeared the overall face-wetness became overwhelming. And Sonshine found it distressing too.
Witnessing every single thing happening,
Boil potatoes until very soft ~ you want them to break apart when you pierce them with a knife or fork. Drain and mash with non-dairy milk (please make sure it’s not vanilla or coconut flavors!), adding “butter” if desired.
A female activist who arrested a year ago for attacking the monarchy in a political speech in Bangkok is being tried in secret for insulting the royal family.
A little over a year ago, a genius coworker of mine began a discussion at the club on how to better limit and monitor our members’ technology use. It wasn’t an issue of having members exposed to inappropriate content on websites or in songs on their i-pods, but rather was an issue of the effects of technology on them as a person, regardless of content. She sent us this article from the New York Times that discusses how the increase in technology use amongst our nations kids has effected their ability to play creatively and socialize with their peers.
The questioner, now with a definite air of disbelief in his voice, said, “But if you were selling me a microwave oven I would expect you to know the principle of operation”.
Mittens also attends Chinese classes at Berries World, and he seems to be enjoying it so far. At home we try to reinforce his lessons as much as possible. Chinese is so interesting in that many characters are actually derived from pictures, so hopefully videos such as this one, will help inspire them to learn more. I also bought a set of Chinese Character Dominoes from a BP for them. Right now they’re just playing with it as a toy, but hopefully they get the idea. Eventually.
(NOTE: Nocenzi is announcing another encore, but transmission fades out to radionews)
So, from my pencil written notes, below is a list of encouraging things to say to children:
I don't drink. My favorite fun drink is an Icee. Yes, I'm 5.
Ruby brown color, with a rather strong offwhite head. Balanced nose with a caramel malt and piney hop scent. This head ain't going nowhere. Decent hops and late bread on the flavor. A little watery maybe 3/4 of the way back on the palette, and the AT has medium hop citrus bite. Low 3 Star.
Now, as I sit here, there is the part of me pulling for action. That restless ego that doesn’t like to sit still and let the universe string together the pattern that will shape the outcome I want to manifest. But, I have learned, and am still learning, that in the quiet space of allowing we are given the gifts we desire. That everything we need comes to us when we release the pull.
But, there’s an early bird warning: make sure you’re fully awake, aware, and functioning before you walk anywhere. Me? I ate after being awake for two hours, relaxed on the couch, watched Life As We Know It, stepped in some cat feces…
It is pointless to speculate too much about the future.
Chapter three of Objects in Motion is Newton's Three Laws of Motion. I collected several different demonstrations for this class, and thanks to The Happy Scientist, we demonstrated all three with a scale and some hand weights.
Confidence has quite few meanings and is used in rather a range of ways. The first meaning we find is:
There's also a psychological component:
I am gentle with myself in the knowing that thoughts are circulatory. I know that it is my job to guard my mind from the little foxes that destroy the vine, which is my connection to my Source. I know that I am here to live fully all of the promise and the key to living my dreams is in the changing of my thoughts.
One of mountains near my parents house of my childhood was called Satsuki-yama( satsuki is old name of May, yama means mountain), and many wild azaleas were blooming in this season in the mountain. They looked much higher than I when I was a child.
There’s no doubt that the blip is over and its just a matter of waiting to see if those laidback pundits who claim to have been backing Fergie’s experience all season, despite the Man City hype, will have to eat their words (again) if United slip up. Don’t scoff though, a Manchester derby and another banana skin (I’m looking at you Everton). It can happen.
* Place flour in a mixing bowl, combine milk, sugar, soda, salt and melted butter in a small bowl and mix well.
Talk to you all again soon!!
“And those tales are absolutely true. Professional mendicancy has actually become such a profitable occupation in Brooklyn and New York that these swindlers and loafers make more money than honest hardworking men. There is hardly a professional beggar in Brooklyn or Manhattan who is not considerably better off than 75 percent of the people who give alms. Nearly all of them have comfortable sums put away in banks…”
Continuity Errors. I’m sure many people have already twigged the complete retelling of Steven Moffat’s first short story in the form of this Christmas special. Continuity Errors was a brilliant short story in which The Doctor needs to check out a book from a galactic library. The book will help in stop a war. Unfortunately, the book is in a restricted area and the librarian won’t let him through. While not written in first person, the narration follows the librarian, giving her perspective on everything that happens. She never leaves the library, and The Doctor repeatedly meddles in her past, attempting to change her personality to such a degree as to finally allow him to check out the book. A Christmas Carol is the same story, just with more urgency. Now, to a degree I don’t mind that Moffat would retell this story. It is a short story in a long out-of-print collection. Why not put a new spin on it and re-release it into a more permanent format? The only problem is that he has been mining this particular story for virtually everything he has written. This story has a line that declares monster are afraid of The Doctor, a great line, actually. This line has been repeated in The Girl in the Fire Place and The Eleventh Hour. A planetary library re-appears in Silence in the Library / Forest of the Dead. In that same story we have the introduction of River Song, an smart-talking archaeologist who bears a slight resemblance to Bernice Summerfield, a companion originally created by Paul Cornell, who also appears in Continuity Errors. If you can track down the story, it is certainly worth a read because it fits with what the New Adventures line was doing with The Seventh Doctor at the time, and it is fascinating as an indicator for how Steven Moffat would approach Doctor Who when he began to write for it. Sadly, I think this is one of the more irritating aspects of the Moffat era, the recycling of material. A detailed analysis of Steven Moffat’s stories will make recurring elements glaringly obvious. The Doctor talks to children . . . a lot. This is somewhat new. Not only that, he has a tendency to talk to little girls and later meet them when they have grown up, only to find that they are in love with him (Girl in the Fireplace, The Eleventh Hour). We have Sally Sparrow helping a temporally displaced Doctor get back to his TARDIS (How I Spent My Summer Vacation, Blink). We have a dead character continuing to communicate to haunting effect (Silence in the Library, Time of the Angels). We also have a race of aliens who dress in suits, are bald, and exist just out of the vision of humans. These aliens follow us and feed off us in some way. (The Floof in Corner of the Eye, The Silence). Perhaps we could more accurately predict the outcomes of Steven Moffat stories if we study his back catalogue in greater detail. We shouldn’t even limit ourselves to Doctor Who. There is a scene in Jekyll where Thomas Jackman talks to Mr. Hyde via pre-recorded videotape. Quite similar to the Easter eggs on Sally Sparrow’s DVDs in Blink. So while I don’t begrudge Moffat drawing more heavily from his out-of-print story, doing so once more makes him look a bit like a one-trick pony.
But, I think we'll end up getting something, because it seems that our "good" couch is molded too. The mold allergies are acting up in our house, and I think it's from the couch in the living room. It's been moved outside. We'll see if people are breathing better tomorrow with it gone. I'm just hoping/praying that the beds aren't bad too. Can you imagine having to buy new mattress for 7 people. Holy cow. I'm not even going there :)
Double/Imperial IPA and the first we see here in Iceland. Weighting at about 150 IBU´s I was expecting a monster. The sweetness balances well with the bitterness, leaving this beer as the perfect desert. Exceptional!
Okay, so the films starts out with a pretty girl driving at night during a downpour. Her name is Michelle Mancini, though we won't find that out officially until a later on. Anyway, it's pouring out, she's driving, and there's a college radio program being hosted by Tara Reid, so I'm assuming it's about substance abuse...The radio station is at a school called Pendleton, where the majority of the movie takes place.
I coloured the tags using Dylusions inks before using the stamp to create the backgrounds.
Alabado y ensalzado
2. Post 12 fun facts about yourself on the blog post.
The signs and wonders that our Lord did were never used like the charlatans do nowadays in an attempt to draw large numbers of suckers in order to fleece them of their money. No, our Lord used healing the sick, raising the dead, and making the blind see as witnesses to his deity and messiahship. In John 6, for example, our Lord rebukes those who seek the signs and miracles.
We stop at all yarn and fiber related shops. That's a given.
"Go and draw me something" she'd say. And I'd momentarily be flummoxed. Really? Mummy wants me to draw her
Esther has her reasons for this unusual pastime. As a kid she recalls seeing an ugly, hairy, humanoid face out the window. Since then, she’s had more strange encounters – sometimes alone, sometimes with others – that she believes point to the reality of Bigfoot.
Dr. Montague is a supernatural researcher who has finally found the perfect haunted house -- Hill House -- so he rents it out (naturally no one was living there at the time) and writes letters to dozens of people who, for one reason or another, seem like they may be receptive to ghosts and hauntings. Only two people respond: the shy and inexperienced Eleanor, who spent the past decade caring for her sick and recently deceased mother, and who experienced a three day storm of stones on her house after her father died when she was a young girl; and the cynical and urbane and somewhat psychic Theodora who comes out to Hill House from the city on a whim after a big fight with her partner. The doctor and the two women are joined by Luke, the nephew of the woman who currently owns Hill House.
A film and a former superintendent of the Oregon State Penitentiary will be presented by a group opposed to Oregon’s death penalty.
The smugglers charged up to $45,000 a head to transport the 493 Sri Lankans to Canada. One man died at sea. All have claimed refugee status, including some the government is alleging are former members of the Tamil Tigers rebel group.
few words as possible. Shorter is always better, if it
Oddly author Colm Ó Toibín echoed this in a statement on the programme. That Irish Catholics take the “religious aspect” of the Church but have rejected the “church authority”.
So – next time you are filling out a 360 form, be honest, but give real feedback that will help the person receiving it – preferably with a specific example of when a behaviour resulted in a particular outcome.
Supports extending the payroll tax cuts benefitting the Middle Class paid for by imposing a 3.25% tax on income over $1,000,000? NO
She who tips her lost children to the wind
So, what does current evidence show about different treatments for autism?
“I think the economic logic behind dumping a load of toxic waste in the lowest-wage country is impeccable and we should face up that”, according to a memo with Summers’ signature, although actually Summers was a mere plagiarist of Harvard economist Lant Pritchett’s genius, insiders allege.
When I walked out of my professor’s office, I felt like I could be a writer. I never once thought any less of myself for the topic I chose. I thought I was following directions for the assignment. He wanted to be shocked.
Hardcover Nova Science Pub Inc (April 2011)
Sad thinking I won't be seeing Lana and her other friends in Brooklyn tomorrow night.
Nothing of any relevance to this story happened between 1958 and 1998/9 when, as I have indicated, I spent a winter in London. After the diagnosis of bronchiectasis on my return to New Zealand I commenced the programme of antibiotics, inhalers and chest clearing exercises recommended by my respiratory physician. There were bad patches, particularly when the weather was humid, but for the most part I was able to function well. Sharon and I had a big overseas trip in 2004 and again in 2008 after a further and very successful hip resection the previous year. We did not stay in London but did take day trips into the city from my daughter Sacha's place in Hemel Hempstead.
Write the books that you would want to read, and know that you can. Don't try to write something for a market, or because you think it's the kind of book that a publisher might be looking for.
Does your comic book reading need a hefty does of retro-futurism? Could your graphic novel collection use a dash of far future etherpunk western? Are your webcomic choices woefully bereft of Victorian scientists toting ray guns and having adventures?
Palin however, must be unaware of the official Holiday/Christmas cards issued by such past Presidents as Richard Nixon, Gerald Ford and Ronald Reagan. How else could she explain her lack of criticism at those Republican Presidents who also chose to mail cards which lacked depictions of families and Christmas trees? Nixon’s card showed George Washington overseeing the construction of the White House without depicting one single image of Christmas. Ford’s card showed a wintery snow-covered exterior scene of an old farm house and livestock. Reagan’s card was very similar to Obama’s. It too featured an image of a White House fireplace with some holiday wreaths and floral decoration, but with no Christmas tree or emphasis of family. Indeed, the Reagan card did not even feature the American icon known as “the family dog”. Where was the conservative right-wing outrage at those Presidents? Hmmm…
The total number of security officials is said to be anywhere in the region of between 24,000 and 49,000 in total.
Realized yesterday that I hadn't posted in about a week...What?!
With the current lack of any official blurb at the moment, I managed to catch up with Martin Day, who gave me a little information about Children of Steel. It sounds like a cracking story!
Deeds not words! Justice delayed is justice denied. Mr. President you have betrayed both justice and our community. You have betrayed the many LGBTQ people who worked, donated and voted for your election. You have made a mockery of your campaign slogan “Hope” and your actions have written the word “False” across that noble sentiment.
the next couple of days so I won't be writing much.
The theme is: ANYTHING GOES!!!........ so you don't have excuses... we let you free to create in complete freedom..... show us what you can do!!!
I've lived in Colorado since I was twelve, but my trip to Estes Park two years ago was the first I ever saw elk. The second time was this past November. They're neat animals to observe.
As David Beaulieu said; “The war on lawn weeds in general — not just dandelions — is based on the notion that “the lawn is meant to showcase the diligence of the person who owns it. According to this view, lawns should be uniformly composed of grass, with no “intruders” permitted.
I also love the packaging, although I think the size is way too small for the product being a blush.
I was a Cold War warrior, that's the beginning and end of your story, actually. When I was in the Army, I wasn't going to stay in the Educational Corps if anything happened, because there would have been more exciting things to do. But we were all like that, in 1947, '48, which was my Army service. As one chap in the mess said, "What are you doing now, young fellow?" I said, "Well I'm going up to Oxford." He said, "Oxford? How long?" I said, "Three years." He said, "No, no. We'll have you back before three years is up." And of course the Korean War broke out. I remember I was in France at the time with another chap, in the summer, it was June, July. He said, "Well, we're both on Z Reserve, do we go home now and curtail the holiday?" And I said, "Well, I suppose we ought to go home." He said, "I'm not going home! I'm going to have my holiday! I don't care if the third world war starts!"
While working on the high tunnel a couple of weeks ago, I vowed to write a post on tools. The impetus? Yet another sub-par Canadian Tire special doing its best to thwart my progress.
Which made 2 gallons of soap. 2 gallons=32 cups or 64 loads
JPMorgan CEO Jamie Dimon). She is also the founder of
We also know that case was first reported by New York Daily News, which broke the story – and which should have been credited for doing so by the Forward but, oddly, was not. That’s the only reason we know about it. But there could be dozens of other cases of sickened babies, including cases where a MBP-transmitted HSV1 infection or even killed a baby. But we don’t know because the information is kept secret.
I don't know the truth behind the allegations against Herman Cain, though I suspect there's at least a small element of how dare a black guy be a Republican among some who believe that minorities are supposed to be Democrats. Whatever, enough mud has been thrown that he's dropped out of the contest for the GOP nomination. So, thinking back to that vote matching thing I was playing with last month, who'd get most of Cain's support, Paul or Perry? And will the media there let Gary Johnson get any attention now?
I hate you because you raped our daughter.
2 small onions, coarsely chopped or sliced
My kids totally understand that I have a different surname to them, and they don’t question it at all. Although I have no doubt my daughter would be delighted if I legally changed my name to Dora.
Stamp2Cut system with the Eclipse machine from Sizzix
Your testimony should include a description of when you came under conviction for your sins.
4. Pop the dough back into a lightly oiled bowl and cover with oiled clingfilm. Leave it somewhere warm to rise for an hour.
“Silva sustains a solid mystery that manages to keep readers engaged throughout the many plot twists and turns. A well-constructed story that lays a promising foundation for the rest of the series.” — Kirkus Reviews (starred review)
Oh, good card I think! We have the 10 of cups and there look at the image at the top of this post—good image isn’t it? I mean, considering our question. She’s looking down and he seems to be trying to look into her eyes to figure her out. The rainbow above and cups with it represent emotional happiness perhaps and how she once was but currently there’s a different look than appears on the woman sitting on the rainbow.
I brushed the stain gel on and let it set for about a minute and wiped it off. The lighter strips turned out a little to light so a kind of dry brushed some more red mahogany stain over those areas to darken them up a little.
The Plimsouls embodied rock & roll in its purest, undistilled form in the era when post-punk droned and new wave popped. Whether on record or onstage, this foursome unleashed urgent, white-hot performances of expertly constructed songs by frontman Peter Case that effortlessly straddled the perfection of British Invasion pop, the raucous, edgier side of early punk and garage rock, and the foundational elements of maximum R&B and wailing soul.
So, this site is cool if you're like me and like categorizing things. It's basically an online way to keep track of your closet. You have different areas that you can input pictures of your clothes into: tops, bottoms, jeans, outerwear, etc. They have a searchable database of clothing, but if you can't find it (because you're like me, and everything you own is like, 20 gazillion years old or on super-sale when you buy it, and no longer available online,) you can also just upload it from your phone/computer/whatevs. You can also follow profiles of people you know (or just like the style of,) define your style on your profile, make wishlists, etc.
Congratulations Carrie.
Half the fun of dining at Din Tai Fung is the chance to watch the dumpling makers in action, clearly visible through the glassed-in kitchen out the front. There's always something to look at - from the man stretching a skipping rope of noodles by bouncing it effortlessly onto the metal bench; to the secret huddle of staff deftly folding dumplings in the corner; to the man checking the bamboo baskets of dumplings, cloaked in dramatic clouds of steam.
This summer, I wanted to make a concerted effort to read with my daughter. She is an avid reader, but I still try to read aloud with her at night. A few of the books that we've read have been new to both of us, but some were books that I read as a child (the Little House series, and Mandy, which she loved as much as I remembered loving it). I had seen several recommendations for the book The Penderwicks.
I’ll be honest. I really don’t keep up with current events. You would think that after four years of journalism classes where I’ve learned the importance of media in society that I would have gained some semblance of desire to read the newspaper every once in a while, but no.
media all over the world. Those news media who are penciled in for
Anyone else notice a disconnect between her two statements? So where is she most likely to show her true intent — in public, or in a forum of friends?
The case involved a woman whose bong had about 2 1/2 tablespoons of liquid that tested positive for methamphetamine. A narcotics officer had testified that drug users sometimes keep bong water to drink or inject later.Really? Drink the bong water? Eeeew. Although where does it stop? What about pipes? That would be paraphernalia, but I'm sure you could probably scrape out stuff or lick it or something. If your pipe or one-hitter has enough residue, could it too be considered the equivalent of the controlled substance?
So how come we adults forgot all about non-goal-directed action, spontaneous whole-body engagement with learning, and creating opportunities for learning? Sir Ken Robinson, in a 2006 TED talk, explains how traditional, “serious” learning practices have put child creativity, and so human creativity, to waste (obrigada pela dica no seu blog, Cláudia!). Perhaps not knowing what there is to learn, and not knowing that one is learning, is what makes learning effective. And why we learn best through play. My next post will have a few examples of how multilingual children learn to be multilingual, their way.
In his commentary on Jung’s work Anthony Storr, quoting the psychologist writes: “The goal toward which the individuation process is tending is ‘Wholeness’ or ‘Integration’: a condition in which all the different elements of the psyche, both conscious and unconscious, are welded together. The person who achieves this goal possesses 'an attitude that is beyond the reach of the emotional entanglements and violent shocks – a consciousness detached from the world’. Individuation, in Jung’s view, is a spiritual journey; and the person embarking upon it, although he might not subscribe to any recognised creed, was nonetheless pursuing a religious quest. By paying careful attention to the unconscious, as manifested in dream and fantasy, the individual comes to change his attitude from one in which ego and will are paramount to one in which he acknowledges that he is guided by an integrating factor which is not of his own making.” (The Essential Jung, P229).
The hops were pretty much 100% Cluster however feel free to play around with these as you see fit. Goldings always do a great job. Bullion work pretty nicely as did Challenger. This ferments pretty cool so take note and make sure the yeast doesn’t drop out.
How does it get better than that?
reminiscence: the scene of you’ve got mail with the picture of twirling and the thought of standing on someone’s boots as they twirl you around and around.
The poem is ironic and sorrowful; it is honest and tender. It is about a moment in the poet’s life but it is also about the life of the poet, the poet who works not only by artificial or even candlelight by the lights of the city itself, “taxi light” “seared light of Brooklyn,” a city “fat with night light” lights that distort reality yet illuminate the mystical quality of the city and the poet. The story the city “tells back” is the city as poem— her “wild fancy,” the city enveloping her imagination.
EASTON, Pa. – Lafayette men’s basketball top assistant Josh Loeffler has accepted a position as Director of Basketball Operations at Rutgers University, joining Scarlet Knights’ head coach Mike Rice.
Now, position your crop square at the upper left corner of your layout, then drag the bottom right corner of the crop square to the bottom right corner of your layout.
“No, I didn’t summon you. This is merely invitation. And yes, something doesn’t fit quite right with this guy. And your entanglement with him troubles me a lot”
Five Ways To Make A Young Mum Feel Inadequate*
Pregnancy is what brought me full-fledged into the blog world. Actually, it was more the immediate postpartum period, but now I know that for future pregnancies, there are some amazing blogs and websites I would be frequently checking. The Natural Parents Network has an amazing list of resources for pregnant women. Perusing these sites and links helped me learn a lot about healthy, normal pregnancy as well as feel a connection with women who have or were currently experiencing the same things as me.
Let's get right to it, k!?
This is a beautiful Double Page Layout that is perfect for Easter or Mother's Day pictures. This layout is beautiful and classy!!!
I have seen what all those years of government schooling would have done to them. Walk into a high school, or just wait outside and watch them exit. How many seem apathetic to everything around them? Listen to a group of them talk about school do you hear a lot of positive thoughts? Go into a fast food restaurant where many are working, can they think, count back change, understand how to converse with a customer? I have realized that many teens seem to have no idea of their own thoughts and opinions, they want someone to tell them.
This month feels different. I guess we're just both in a different place, mentally. Last month, we were sooooo excited. We had confidence, optimism, we were praying non-stop, asking for prayers non-stop, talking about it non-stop, thinking about it non-stop. And then we got a massive let down. I think we're both still licking our wounds.
Plus, I had to work in the morning!
I took advantage of the promotion Zoya was having, giving two free Zoya polishes and you only had to pay shipping. I finally got them in the mail a couple days ago; I picked Faye, Tanzy, and bought Jules.
“It is the first example we know of a couple wed in childhood wanting the marriage to be annulled, and we hope that others take inspiration from it,” Kriti Bharti, the social worker who orchestrated the annulment, told AFP.
The two posts were by two different cancer survivors. The topic of their entires were about how their cancer experiences have taken them away from what was once a more “normal” life, to a life more or less ruled by cancer. It was clear to me, their frustrations with this new way of life. A life that involved hospital stays, routine scans, pain, uncertainty and great stress. A life that, even after chemotherapy, still involved many doctor visits, routine scans and uncertainty. While both explained how they were grateful for what they’ve learned from their experience, I could not shake the sense of anger or frustration I got from their posts.
I didnt mind the job so much..…that is ….until Pam opened the door.
There are some people who are afraid to live alone, but most people look forward to the opportunity to live alone. That being said, just because you think that living alone would be a good experience does not mean that you are ready to jump in and do it. There are some things you will want to make sure of before you make a decision. You may find that you are not ready to live your own.
- A place of study, teaching, learning, healing.
Double cheeseburger from McDonald's: made with, umm, made with, hmmm, ok, I got nothin' here.
North: “Powers of Earth, the land that will hold Springtime flowers and plants. We call you to our circle, so that we may celebrate you showing yourself once more, taking melted snow deep into you, allowing the power of the sun to enter your bounty of plant life. We call you so that we may celebrate all of the animals returning, taking safe refuge using you. We call you mighty Earth, Hail and Welcome!”
One Verwood resident at the meeting said: “The increased traffic from the lorries is certainly going to be a problem for me getting to and from home. As you go past Moors Valley itself you see the forest and the trees and to think all that could disappear and become landfill, it will be an eyesore and it will have a huge environmental impact. We have to make sure it doesn’t happen.”
I opened my writing software and was going to work but then I couldn't remember exactly what I wanted to do with it so I started reading what I'd already done, made a few adjustments and then I got tired and bored and lost interest before I even finished reading it, let alone write anything new.
Numba 7: Their grooming costs more money than I spend on myself for grooming. 40 big ones for 1 dog. and yes there's four of them. Holy bitchtits batman, it doesn't cost that much for toothpaste shampoo and razors to shave my ass. I go around with long-ish hair since I, for some reason, cant afford to get my hair cut every three months or so, yet the dogs get theirs done every two months. Sharp.
As a result, sightings of her as a young cub were few and far between, and when seem, were normally of a ball of fur dashing off into thick bush. By 5-6 months old, Rockfig was tolerating the presence of the vehicles more, and was acting far less aggressively towards the Land Rovers, and this allowed us to sit at a distance and wait for Nkateko to shyly show herself.
As you can see, the book makes a compelling case against Lord Victor Rothschild, whom I believe was never formally uncovered because of his family's massive wealth and influence. Having read the book however, one is left with little doubt that Rothschild was the Fifth Man. He was held in such high esteem in fact, that Churchill entrusted him with testing all his food before it was consumed! Thus he was privy to all sorts of information that was simply unaccessible to other potential spies.
His questions follow one after the other, “You’ve met someone? You’re already fucking someone else? Are you just trying to make me jealous?”
As I say, they’re fun to make, but only with caution if this is a baking sesh for your toddler (although I am told that children of any age- i.e. not just my child- have the irresistable urge to nick pieces of chocolate/melted chocolate/chocolate-covered bran and that goes for adults too. Not that I know from experience).
Consigned to obscurity for nearly thirty years, "Woman Blue" was resurrected by the white folk singers of the early Sixties and recorded for the first time, as "I Know You Rider." From the coffee houses of Greenwich Village, the song migrated to rock acts interested in folk music; it eventually became a concert staple for the Grateful Dead. (They performed it more than 500 times.) A few years ago, the Allman Brothers began playing it, and the song with roots in Texas prisons and work farms became a transcendent communal anthem complete with virtuoso guitar solos.
And you know and I know my clone sleeps alone
Essentially the Rotary damper rotates the axial movement of the Linear damper into a Rotary movement. All the components have the same function, they just move in a different orientation. Thus the damper body is deep “keyhole” shape and the damper rod (known as the vane) rotates in the body, the vanes arm sweeping through a small angular rotation in the keystone section of damper body. The damping valves are placed in the face of the damper vane and work in exactly the same manner as a Linear damper.
And all the way back
Their absence, deliberately intended or otherwise, illustrates the difficult task the judge faces when he prepares to write his report.
And so I carried on. Or rather, I didn’t. Graduation was a bad time for me since I just broke up with my girlfriend then. Obviously, all that rejection didn’t help. No one would hire me, no one would love me! For a while, I quit on me. I gave up! I decided to just bum and see where life would take me. I didn’t care anymore.
I have a lot on my mind right now, so I'm gonna share a fraction of it right quick. Friends. That word makes me cringe nowadays. I don't even want to think about the past few years and how things have changed, bla bla bla. But it is so annoying to be ditched/tossed aside/not really cared about from 2006 to 2011; now suddenly you want to act like we're the best of friends again in 2012? Biiiiiitch! Don't expect me to drop everything and come running every time you wanna hang out.
And I have a confession to make – I am the world’s WORST when it comes to sending out Christmas cards. Procrastinator extraordinaire. I usually end up addressing them around the twentieth, swearing to myself that this year will NOT be a repeat of last years fiasco, and then they hang out in my car until…oh, the middle of January? And then the holidays are over and I realize I’ve been a douchebag again. But these cards are going to revolutionize my tardy habits, because they’re A) GORGEOUS – not your usual cards at all, and B) my kids will love them and bug me until I actually MAIL them.
R: Righty or lefty: righty
I really connected with this line:
Come from the Chief Rabbinate?
to empathize
1tsp - pepper corns
“To live is the rarest thing in the world. Most people exist, that is all.”
I'm amazed at the thoughtfulness people once put into sending these pieces...
When my story came to an almost end, Matthias asked me as to why I haven’t been back to Canada yet, to meet my birth parents. I told him the same thing I said at the beginning of this post. Money, emotional support and the kids.
This student taped a string to our table and put a paper clip in the string. The students had SO much fun making the paper clip "hang" in the air!
In politics is winning everything? The Ides of March a movie written, directed and mostly financed by George Clooney is a morality play about winning. Does the end justify the means? Is it worth trading your soul to win?
I'll never look at a package of chicken breasts the same again.
Born from the silence and lack of interference,
A new set of beached bleached hair highlights, a new set of dreams
I can’t say enough about them and I’m afraid to gush too much for fear of ruining the element of surprise for you if you’ve never heard them. So! Get to a computer A S A P and look them up! THEN! Arrive next Saturday night for an evening of mystical carpet rides, you soon won’t forget! And buy their new EP – Born Under a Veil!
Between the downhill races there are also uphill races., one for boys of 12 years and under, one for girls and an 'open' race there is an open mens and open womens uphill race too!
Anyway, on the way home, I had the thought to stop by the Child and Family Psychiatric clinic and see if the post doctor could see Jake on an emergency basis. They were closed. Crap. But they would be back in a 12:30.
08/04/2011 SELL 0.01 usdmxn 11.8786
“You just missed George,” she said. “He was here since very early; but all I did was sleep, so I sent him home to rest.”
What I say to end the conversation: You really can’t.
Well, this one is hard to nail down. Big alcohol bite for some reason. Fair amount of bitterness, but again the malt seems lower than it should be. It's there in the body, but not the taste, for some reason. It should be a little sweeter, but instead it's more like a bitter. Not bitter as in hops, but bitter as in the style. The finish is hollow and a bit harsh.
Still it was a prison, where every move has to be approved, and all doors have a firm key.
Once home, I asked my six year old if everything was OK while I was away and if they were worried:
Make a loop at the end of the wire using round nose or wire looping pliers. Wrap the wire around an ear wire jig, wig jig or mandrel. You can also form the the ear wire by hand by draping the wire over your finger.
soothes my restless soul
Nitshcke is an extremist and self-publicist who is on public record as supporting suicide for people including (in his own words) ‘the depressed, the elderly bereaved, the troubled teen’.
2. Taj Mahal,
And I am pretty sure that I have the most colorful five minutes ever… Because I’m with him!
Essentially, the old-school boss of the corporation (Bigweld) has been booted to the side and the fancy-pants money-making robot (Ratchet) has taken his place. Ratchet has decided that it is time to stop making spare parts for the robots forcing them to “upgrade” into expensive shiny new parts.
We know our future is in our own hands. This is seen by believers with faith in Man’s ability to transcend his inglorious past as positive, glorious rebirth, awakening, resurrection of our soul, our apotheosis, potential to become one with the gods. The opposite is also true –especially if we continue to contribute to the misuse of energy, pollute and dissipate earthly gifts.
2. Another way to determine it is to decide how many meals I am able to use my veggies in- for instance, with the lettuce I got this week I have made 5 salads and I have used the mushrooms in 2 meals. Once I’ve used all the veggies for the week, I’ll be able to see how much money each serving was. I think last week’s ended up being $0.50 for each serving. not bad!
Here's the card:
In anticipation of a potential scandal, MuslimBridges.org is looking to the Interfaith community to publicly denounce hate and slander against Muslims, and communicate to all people of faith that slander is not a result of “clash of religions,” Rather it is a clash of “Believers Vs. Unbelievers,” often manipulated for political reasons to avert attention from the real challenges facing all of us.
Fast food innovation usually just means making an existing junk food even junkier. Like Onion Rings? Take out the vegtable and inject chicken paste (thanks White Castle.) Like Egg McMuffins? Replace the muffin with pancakes with syrup ON THE INSIDE (thanks McDonalds.) Like ice cream? Add bacon and maple syrup to your sundae (thanks Dennys.)
Surprised? "What's a skeptical, UFO-bashing, aliens- aren't-visiting-us-and-excoriating-cow-you-know-whats scientist-type guy going around saying he loves a movie whose very premise is that not only do aliens exist, but live among us?" you are asking yourself.
Sunday, Kirk and I participated in Vancouver’s annual Sun Run. The Sun Run is Canada’s largest 10K road race, with nearly 50,000 people participating this year. We actually showed up perfectly on time this year (i.e. right before the race started) so I didn’t have time to get any pictures of the MASSIVE crowd and was a little too focused and forgot to stop during the run! Oops!
But her great-grandmother did and her husband too – he saw that one huge lamp fixed on the sky. He got that disease then, or this is how the story goes.
Yup, if it's got paws or claws, feathers or fur we want to see your critter creation.
672 D-V/30/1974. “The Legacies and Illusions of Mohandas K. Gandhi.” University of Chicago Alumni Association, Atlanta, Georgia.
While many other countries in the world celebrate Mother’s Day, those in the UK celebrate Mothering Sunday. Essentially they are just about the same with a few differences of course. The main difference is that many countries celebrate Mother’s Day on the second Sunday in May while Mothering Sunday is celebrated on the fourth Sunday of Lent. However, despite the differences, many people still send flowers and gifts to their mothers on this day. UK florists are just as busy on this day as those in other countries are for Mother’s Day.
I am getting a toothache putting all these photos together in one place... and since we are not a group that generally goes for sugar induced comas, my thought is that these may end up being carrot cake cupcakes with cream cheese frosting. I have never made carrot cake as cupcakes, so do not take my very unexpert advice on this one... I will be checking with my mom. Either way, still awesome looking!
From my 4 very loyal followers, any thoughts, ideas, suggestions, things you might want to read, recipes anything, anything at all?
‘You can’t come dressed like that,’ said Judy. ‘The stockings are integral to the clever illusion of riding an ostrich. Without the stockings, you ruin the effect of the balsa wood legs!’
What if we had been there and been like a coach and suggested they not buy high and take such risk? Had they followed our advice, grudgingly I admit, our clients would have been better off.
Twist of Lemon
-Thanks for reading my report-
Directed by: Jennifer Yuh Nelson
I am entering this one into a few challenges.
Port Brewing Company / Pizza Port Hop 15
I didn't say anything for a moment. It was a shock. AIDS and I heard it in capital fucking letters too.
(SB 3.22.6 Purport)
I feel optimistic about 2012. I think this year is going to bring a lot of change for my family. Although the unknown is often scary, I feel excited wondering about all the new experiences, people, and fun we will know this coming year.
Dual John Smith’s Grand National-winning owner Trevor Hemmings, who was born on June 11, 1935, boasts a classic rags-to-riches story. Brought up in Woolwich Arsenal, south east London, where his father worked at the Royal Ordnance factory, Trevor was sent to Lancashire as a five-year-old during World War II and began life as a bricklayer’s apprentice after leaving school aged 15, before becoming involved in the Pontins holiday business. He eventually became the owner and sold it to Scottish & Newcastle in exchange for a significant share holding in S & N (in 1989). He bought Pontins back in 2000 but retained a stake in S & N, which netted him £218 million when the company was sold in January, 2008. He has recently agreed to sell his major shareholding in Arena Leisure Plc, which owns Folkestone, Lingfield, Southwell, Wolverhampton and Windsor racecourses and manages Doncaster and Worcester, to the Reuben brothers. Arena also has a major part of specialist broadcaster At The Races which owns some of British racing’s media rights. This follows on from him selling Blackpool Tower and the Winter Gardens to the North West resort’s town council for £40 million in March, 2010. He also owns a share of Preston North End FC and is chairman of the TJH Foundation, a charity which makes grants to organisations such as Macmillan Cancer Relief, St John Ambulance, Crimestoppers Trust and the Royal National Lifeboat Association, the Injured Jockeys’ Fund and Racing Welfare. In 2011, he was appointed a Commander of the Victorian Order (CVO) for his work as vice-president of the Princess Royal Trust Carers. In 2011, the Sunday Times estimated Hemmings’ wealth at £550 million, £50 million more on the 2010 figure. Hemmings fulfilled one of his greatest ambitions when Hedgehunter carried his colours to victory in the 2005 John Smith’s Grand National. After years of trying, Hemmings had finally emulated his mentor Fred Pontin, owner of the 1971 National hero Specify, with his 13th Grand National runner. Ballabriggs added a memorable second John Smith’s Grand National success in 2011. His first winner came on the Flat in 1985 but Hemmings now brings on young jumping stock at Gleadhill House Stud, near Chorley, Lancashire, managed by former trainer Mick Meagher, and at his Monymusk Stud in Co Cork. He first tried to win the John Smith’s Grand National with the Stan Mellor-trained Rubika, who finished 14th in 1992. Hemmings, who was made an honorary Jockey Club member in December, 2006, is based on the Isle of Man and is said to have paid £12 million for the Ballavodan estate on the island where his retired horses live. He enjoyed a double at the 2010 Cheltenham Festival with Albertas Run (Ryanair Chase) and Ballabriggs (Fulke Walwyn Kim Muir Handicap Chase). Albertas Run added a second Ryanair Chase victory in 2011 to go with his other Festival triumph in the 2008 RSA Chase and a further Grade One win in the 2010 John Smith’s Melling Chase at Aintree. As well as those already mentioned, his best horses have been Trabolgan, Burton Port, Young Kenny, Blue Shark, Cloudy Lane, Afsoun, Turpin Green, Arctic Jack, The Last Fling and Simply Supreme. His best season numerically came in 2007/08 when his horses triumphed in 51 races in Britain and Ireland. He also has eventers who are ridden by Zara Phillips. Hemmings, who has two Jack Russell terriers named Patch and Brandy and is a fan of both the TV detective series Columbo and the films of Clint Eastwood. John Smith’s Grand National Record:
“I have changed where we stand.
04. Samba safari (03:17)
While we slip through Versailles;
"You haven't got a spiritual bone in your body!" She laughed. "You're like a mad scientist. You want to dissect and know how everything works, and that includes philosophy and religion."
Or maybe it's just time for a good cry.
“Four.”
Your question assumes too many things; that 1) I actually have faults (grins), and better yet, 2) I actually have virtues (grins wider).
7. Remove from the oven. Let it cool and slice into rings. Serve with your favorite catsup or sauces.
take 4-5 hours to get your desired effect.
1. Heat oil in sauce pan and add garlic. Saute for 10 seconds.
The workshop was Half-Square-Triangles and Four Patches; 15 different quilts could be worked on. What fun it is too see all the fabric choices and the blocks going together! Here are a few class pictures:Everyone working away and look at all that design wall space!
I think she very well can.
The Lofstedt report itself states that health and safety regulations are broadly accepted to have been an important contributory factor in safer workplaces. With the evidence showing that legislation is the primary driver for organisations to initiate changes to improve management of health and safety .
Please call the MTA/NYC Transit at (718) 330-1234 with any further questions.
Last night, while watching a few videos from one of my favorite albums, Leonard Cohen's "Ten New Songs," I was reminded of when I was a child and my father did some trapping of mink and ermine in order to make ends meet. We thought nothing of it. It's what men did to get enough money to put food on the table, maybe some women did, too.
1. Given Pakistan’s immediate and long-term problems, the MidEast crisis should be irrelevant to our discourse and low on our list of priorities.
to even come and inform us what they were doing, and without the common
D. Dogs: I've never had one. Kind of want one, kind of don't.
However, these may be my favourite 90s cartoons, they were not my favourite cartoons of all time. Tom and Jerry was by far the best cartoon ever made! I know Mickey Mouse / Disney is a popular choices for this category I, like most others have been drawn towards the cartoons for its humorous violence but for its caring/team effort side to the cartoon too when them would help each other out.
Origin: Turkey (Ankara)
The truth is out there!
16:50 : 18:00 Automating & Delivering Services in your Private Cloud
He also suggested that I get a urine sample from Eric as this was a non-evasive way (Eric is 13) of being able to tell if there is anything seriously wrong.
And the crow is stamped again, cut out and layered with some magic mount.
Next they'll be carrying suitcases full of cash or worse through airports, saying "Oh, what's that in there? Goodness me, I had no idea, some guy just asked me to carry this through as a favour. Terribly sorry, old chap."
boasts hundreds of original rubber
by cowardice or courage
As for the queries themselves. . .I always laugh when an article appears about a best selling book and the writer drags out the number of times the author was rejected. Kathryn Stockett, author of The Help, was rejected sixty times and people are shocked by that number. I’ll tell you right here, that number is common and higher numbers are just as common. The opportunities for rejection abound. In one of my outings in this business, I was rejected closer to eighty times. What I give Ms. Stockett credit for is perseverance. My first agent gave me the following words of wisdom: There are three elements in a successful writing career—luck, talent, and perseverance. Of the three you need only two, but one of them must be perseverance.
September as originally proposed. The review should include options to reverse last year’s parking charge increases, more flexible methods of payment for parking in car parks and town centres, including cash and credit / smart card payment and scrapping of the proposed introduction of car park charges in the 7 remaining free car parks in the Borough. In addition it is imperative that the council work with local traders to ensure that our town centres remain vibrant (and that their economic footprint expands rather than contracts in this difficult economic climate) rather than damaging their viability with punitive
Skirt: Odille, off eBay
There are reports today of a Navy jet crashing into some apartments near Virginia Beach, Virginia, sending flames and thick black smoke into the air.
until smooth. Pour over popcorn and mix well. Add a bit
Break again, Little Lottie
Go check her out!!
In the 1940s and 1950s in Great Britain and the USA, the surgery I had was quite normal for children between the ages of four and eight. Indeed "T's and A's" as they were called (tonsillectomies and adenoidectomies) were the most frequently performed surgical procedure in both countries. In England and Wales the practice peaked in 1930/31 when T's and A's were performed on somewhere between fifty and seventy five percent of elementary and primary school children. There was a further peak in 1951 and estimates for the period from 1945 to the early 1950s were that every year up to a quarter of a million of those school children (about a third of them) had the operation. About forty children a year died from the procedure.
But there is a reason for that fear and we need to find out what it is.
This weekend I was planning on a gentle stroll with Chiz. Scratch that. We’re aiming for 12 hours, should be doable and we’re leaving a car in both valleys. This necessitates a walk back to Tryfan , so if the weather gods deign to be polite and the glycogen stores don’t have a closing down sale… we may just keep going. An out and back. That’s not the ‘goal’ but maybe the dream. Then it’s Tim’s turn the following weekend, you may remember him as he was in the adventure race. The Wall was his idea but due to his exams I’m on my own with that one now. With him being super fit I’m hoping I can run a bit of that attempt on the highest that Wales has to offer. George, the new members secretary at NLMC, is off to Denali in June and it made perfect sense to have a training weekend with me. I feel rather privileged to have such awesome company and can only hope that I can keep up with them all. Having completed the W3000s twice in 15 days a couple of years ago, at least I know what to expect. Monster energy consumption of thousands of calories, I can’t wait!
Chardham, as you already might know that the journey is know as the yatra to attend moksha. The yatra which start after the establishment of kedarnath temple by Adi Shankaracharya, is starting this year form Akshaya Tritiya i.e. 24 April 2012
They mess with the food, water, medical, faith (read Judeo cristianity) usury to keep us poor and let’s not forget the easy credit they offer.
What this permits a photographer to do is to predict the effect of depth of field based on focus and f/stop. In this case, the focus is currently set about 9 feet. At f/11, everything from about 6.5 feet through about 15 feet will be in reasonable focus. How can I determine this? Simply by looking at the two 11 marks. Based on this, I can extrapolate what f/8 would look like — everything from about 7 feet through 12 feet or so will be in reasonable focus. Of course, at f/22, everything from about 5 feet to almost the horizon will be in focus within the depth of field!
Mon/Wed: 3:15 to 6
e) The prohibition for the Defendants to perform the reproduction or comment, opinion or interview, where said thesis is defended or from where it can be inferred;
8. Sleep Walk (3:02)
When we decided to venture out to Pensacola,
For the class we had to put our annotated scripts, character research, blocking, publicity flyers, etc. into a binder for our final grade. I got an 89 on the project because my stage diagrams were not in color. It's a fair cop.
Price $17.99
Monday!! where art thou?
It just so happens that a couple of people reached out to me and to my husband recently. One is a cousin of mine, the other an adult nephew by marriage. We don't get to see either person often at all, but they sent us notes and photos, and let us know that despite the distance and infrequent contact, they care.
Why should I take a graduate job in New Zealand and face an average tax rate of ~25% plus student loan repayments when I can take a graduate job in Asia, pay no more than 15% flat rate and write a cheque to pay off my entire student loan balance within 2-3 years?
Our contests where the warriors eat,
And dumped them all
According to scientists, some of the sounds can have straightforward origins and they can be traced to weather and ocean currents.
on each card!
I love photography. I have been taking pictures for a while now. People have told me my photos are so good I should do it professionally. Photography relaxes me so I try to take pictures every chance I get. When I can’t get out to take pictures, I am going to start making photo books and photo collages of my photos.
AGE had mentioned me in one of his posts and posed a very important question:
What I have laid out for you is three important aspects of the parables. First, Keener teaches that parable teaching is a common feature of teachers and rabbis of that day. This is not a later invention of the church. Second, as Capon noted, the parables turn our conceptions of God, Kingdom, Son of Man upside down and undo all our pretension. Third, as Peterson draws our attention to, parables keep us involved in the conversation by bringing us back to earth. “Why do you stand there staring at the sky?” the angel asked the disciples. Indeed, the answers are not found ‘out there’ or ‘up there.’ Jesus said, “Behold! Look around! You will see the Kingdom of God, indeed God himself, at work in places you never would have thought, under the spell of your own knowledge and wisdom, imaginable.”
(We) have met friends.
I can say that we had a great time, except for a thirty minute period that I spent under my jeep and for the oppressive heat that we endured for the whole four day period. As I have previously stated, Ocotillo is not my favorite part of the desert. Friends and it's proximity to more enjoyable spots still allow me to enjoy going there.
What are your favourite stamps:
Even if this does not occur, many farmers might find themselves obliged to divest themselves of ‘excess' land at the same time, which will flood the market and drive prices down. Since the only buyer to whom the ceilings will not apply will be the Government, the State will be able to take advantage of artificially low prices to buy up large tracts of land.
Example: Coach: “Well, Bob, some might say that the addition of elements of the spread offense to our packages might’ve led to that three hundred percent increase in fumbles, but they don’t take into account the extra six yards of rushing per game we’ve achieved.” You: “I sleep in a drawer!”
I thank God every day that HE has a plan behind all of this.
“Fiesta San Antonio” (or simply “Fiesta”) is an annual spring festival held in San Antonio, Texas with origins dating to the late 19th century. The festival began as a single event to honor the memory of the battles of The Alamo and San Jacinto. Fiesta is the city’s biggest festival, with an economic impact of $284 million for the Alamo City. More than three million people take part in Fiesta. They can choose from more than 100 events that take place all over the city and beyond.
Just one of the penguins :)
There are groups of people that I am honestly not comfortable around and I look at how Jesus connects with people and if I’m desiring to be like Christ I have to ask him to break down those walls in my heart. We have to love how Christ loves. This does not mean that we accept sinful lifestyles as though they were ok. What it does mean is that we are called to meet these people where they are to then bring them to Christ.
Never laugh at their expense.
1 lb. tri-colored rotini pasta (corkscrew)
We are on the verge here of a change. Hitherto it has been force of circumstance and of background which has rendered the very idea of integration inaccessible to the greater part of the immigrant population - that they never conceived or intended such a thing, and that their numbers and physical concentration meant the pressures towards integration which normally bear upon any small minority did not operate.
British Bulldog Condoms
If there is a sizeable number of people who think the constitution is illegitimate and the consensus around is weak, there is a risk down the line that this would make a coup (soft or hard) easier. Egypt will be naturally coup-prone in the next few years, and while the Brothers say they want consensus, the Salafists have a more winner-takes-all approach and want to nominate figures such as Sheikh Mohammed Hassan, a popular preacher, who will push for a very strict interpretation of Sharia
Romans 10:10-11
This means you can buy a set of drawers for $50 and put them together yourself with a screwdriver and a hammer, instead of buying the piece already put together for $100.
come on!
“If you don’t tell me what’s going on I’m going in and asking Greer.”
There are also a great deal of helpful resources online. In fact, there are so many that I’m not sure how to divide up just the ones I know about so that there’s a nice round Top Ten list. Therefore, please know that the following list is an incomplete list on the subject of prayer. The following links will take you to websites that will provide resources about prayer, (and which will certainly help you in your prayer life), but will not necessarily include prayers and devotionals. I’ll share a list down the road that will include those things.
1. Be a follower of Everything Under the Moon.
sending frothy white waves
When British ships anchored in American harbors, Americans kept them under surveillance from land, and innocent looking cargo boats and fisherman could approach them. Since the British had to assume that any given colonist was a loyal British subject until they proved otherwise, they remained vulnerable to close surveillance any time they dropped anchor in an American harbor or tied off at an American dock.
"I wanna see Megan on the puter" (we just skyped with our friend in the Dominican Republic)
Or should I say, yarn? I am bringing you a page today using the Storyteller line from Crate Paper...it is featured in the April My Scrapbook Nook kit. There are so many cool things in this kit! I have loved every second of it.
So back to my first dilemma, what ages are these books for? There are so many categories of children writing! Who’d a thunk!
"I know, but they're still fun to have!"
- How are meanings, identities and sense of place linked to underlying values of people?
Night Shadows: Think of X-Files with a twist. A federal agent who investigates paranormal and supernatural occurrences teams with a Des Moines homicide officer trying to stop a horde of killer shadow creatures.
A salad course on its own seems a little unusual to Australian palates, but this is very common on French menus. We welcome the chance to clean our palates, especially when we realise most of the salad greens -- curly watercress, rocket, fennel fronds and radicchio -- have come straight from the backyard garden.
Homemade Wholegr. Macaroni & Cheese
I'm sitting here drinking a Corona and watching Unbeatable Banzuke. Clear bottle with the funky smell and flavor. Maybe some malt and corn in there, but I'm not feeling it. Even in my tall pilsner glass, this stuff ain't the ticket. But I wanted something light. Should probably keep some Heineken on keg in the house. But I just wanted to say a bit about Taco Mac in Atlanta: Come for the Taco, stay for the Cougars.
As our children grow, we celebrate many "firsts" and "lasts" in their lives. From the first time they sleep through the night to the last day they walk out of high school, a range of emotions mark these milestones.
Yesterday, I had an early birthday celebration with my parents. My birthday isn’t until next Friday, but because of my BodyPump training next weekend I am completely booked.
I'm constantly arranging and rearranging my sidebar to reflect what I want my customer/reader to see. As a seller on Etsy I want them to see my store feed. I also don't want my reader to "hunt" for the "follow" button. I want both of those things to be prominent and readily available. Remember, most readers skim through a blog so you want every advantage...just like a newspaper - above the fold!
I use a combo of olive oil and a little sesame oil for flavor to cook it it.... and I vary the amounts of veggies used depending on how many I am feeding...
There is always good and there is always bad, and generally, the good outweighs the bad, but these days, those good things aren’t doing it for me like they once did. Or maybe the bad has just gotten that big.
I just thought this picture was so cute. Darcy and my dad playing with her new piggy bank in front of the birthday banner.
Deciding to carry on my spontaneity theme from Saturday, I just told the clerk I wanted the phone and an hour later (following the usual gumph and choosing a price plan), I walked out with an iPhone 4S 32GB device. All I have to do now is cancel the insurance on my existing item and the last vestiges of my 3½ year association with phones4U will have been swept away.
In true Maria style she starts things off with a bang. Literally. Things pick up right where Inside Out left us - Trella is complacent in the fact that she's fulfilled her part in the rebellion and now she just wants to return to her old life of being alone and exploring new places. But naturally things don't work out that way; we get to see Trella really struggling with this new threat and who she can trust. The suspense is tight throughout the entire story.
political ascendancy to them.
I dream about crochet/crafty projects at the moment, I guess because I don't have the time during the day, but I have to say, I am the happiest I think I have ever been.
Hathi and Chiti is an emerging new global children's brand for all ages, that uses eastern-themed characters and concepts as a gateway to educate little ones about different cultures around the world. Hathi and Chiti are the Indian words for elephant and ant. Hathi, an elephant, and Chiti, an ant, are best friends from India folklore whose adventures together are of legendary proportion. Hathi Chiti uses folklore as a backdrop for modern day storytelling as a way of explaining the world and sharing life lessons.
869. More delicious White Carrot & Potato Soup and Mediterranean Salad @ Kimberton Whole Foods (Kimberton, PA) 1:02 p.m.
regardless of the desire and spirituality of the individual himself. We have to explore our individual Jewish identification not as the verdict of these external forces, but as the conscious decision of the individual himself based on his intellectual understanding of the history of the Jewish people and their unique role in the advancement of the ideas of “A Better World” for every human being. We have to create our own individual programs of being Jewish, work on their implementation and enjoy it.
I did, however, find these recent blogs that I found delightfully informative:
Other races (all raising money for Rainbow Trust Children’s Charity) planned are Grimsthorpe Ultra in August (70 miles), Shotley Challenge in September (55 miles) and hopefully another Duathlon as well as some local Triathlons along the way too!
BBW Leaves & Cozy Autumn Vanilla - OK so my house has smelled like Leaves since it was re-released this fall LOL. I have candles in that scent everywhere and I also have a Wallflower going near my front entrance. So amazing! Cozy Autumn Vanilla is that slutty vanilla scent, but it's so amazing. I've grabbed so many of the lotions when they went 75% off I will smell like a whore forever!!!
Almost makes up for not having a summer this year.
This is as close as you can get to the main shrine for taking pictures. It is not just photography that is banned inside the temple. Also not allowed are children below aged 2 (didn’t get to ask them why); cell-phone that is switched on, and men in half-pants with their shirts and vests on. I guess they don’t allow females in jeans and nighties either.
The Bible is the document by which a Christian should lead his life, and the Constitution of the United States is the document by which the country should be governed. I have no problem with this and see no conflict. According to my religious beliefs, a homosexual couple, living together, are living in sin. According to the constitution, two consenting adults, living together are none of my business.
That's all for today. Be sure to stop back Monday. I'll have a fun teaser of one of the new January MFT releases to share with you!
May 3rd: VIP Preview hosted by Yelp Elite, Catered To You and Hip Hop Is Cool Again from 6-8pm (Invitation Only)
I told him that I did not know of any sand pit cliffs in the area, but I had heard about an old stone quarry just north of Boston, where kids jumped into the water off some of the protruding ledges. He asked if I would take him over the weekend. Max, my younger son, overheard the conversation and wanted in, so I agreed to take them both.
However, as the vet explained, we are not even half way there yet. She has shown as much improvement as we could ever have hoped for over the last 8 or 9 weeks - now he wants to see how she maintains that as she comes back into more work. He still doesn't want us to do any work in the arena, as he thinks that may well have contributed to her lameness originally; so we keep doing the straight line work, but he wants me to build her up to an hour of walk at least every other day, starting to introduce some trot after the first four or five weeks. I can vary this with long-reining and ridden work.
Then the nightmares will be fun,
Now in this new state I was new! But the lies followed. I was smaller than all these 7th graders who had al already hit puberty. Soon people were making fun of my name because it can be shortened but I go with the long version. I like my name long it makes me feel special. Anyways the made fun of that, my ugly haircut, my cheap clothes, me being smart, my purity, the fact I’ve never had a girlfriend, and a whole lot more. Eventually I though hey look high school is a few weeks away. A fresh start. I was wrong.
I'm not reformed. This is only the first go round so if you see me post more soups they HAVE to be good enough to make since I ate it.
Then in rhythm it is gone,
The beginning of 2010 marked the end of 2009's project 365. I assume that the grey hairs that started to crop up about this time were to protest me doing a repeat. Whatever. That's why they make hair dye.
as we sailed around the ground but then
Most kids in my fifth grade class were nervous about going to middle school. Not me. I was tired of the silly baby stuff and ready to be treated like a real human being. I was sure my odds were pretty good that Harold wouldn’t be in any of my classes because he was going the “accelerated track” and I was going the “regular track.” Accelerated classes meant you were pretty smart and regular meant, well, you were regular. Regular was fine by me, especially if it meant I’d get to meet new kids, without Harold ruining it for me. Maybe even become a part of the “Cool Kid Crowd” at Jackson Park Middle School.
This is not a heartwarming story about a mom in distress, but a child being raised as a homeless person. It’s not Chelsea’s fault that the adults in her life, for whatever reason, are unable to work within the system and make choices to provide for Chelsea. She is deserving but hard to help.
I'm always looking for masculine card inspiration and Stephanie knocked this one out of the park with her Father's Day card. I love the stitching on the fishtail flags. So perfect!
More importantly I ceased to care about three months before you even started planning to come to NYC. It was not problem then. It’s not my problem now.
There are also poetic forms which are a gift to the busy teacher looking for fresh inspirations such as - villanelle, cinquain, sestina - Sestina for primary school kids!!
11. You don’t need a guidebook to experience the best in a country… Just ask a local
Also looked good on the outside and from the website. And when I walked in, it was totally serene. Hell, they even had classical music playing. During the tour, the director answered all of my questions and even asked me some! About my child!! Their after-school program is about 1/4 the size of the program at Option #1, which was way, WAY too big, in my opinion. And they offer an orientation and tour and bus pick-up run through for the new kiddos (none of which were offered by Option #1). So yeah... I'm going to be taking The Geej by there next week to check it out and see what she thinks, but I'm feeling pretty good about Option #2. I mean, as good as you CAN feel about other people having to take care of your kids while you earn a living. Sigh.
In fact, almost as if to prove my point, it disappeared as quickly as it began and I truly thought nothing more about it.
I can hardly believe it myself but I haven’t taken on a romance author in over a year –until now. In fact, I haven’t taken on a historical romance author since Sherry Thomas and oddly enough, it was Sherry who discovered Courtney Milan and sent her my way.
M.S: When I was 21, I went to study in Freiburg, Germany for a year. I did this alone and independently, without the aid of a "study abroad" programme. I had to pass a written and oral exam to prove that my German was good enough. I had to find my own accommodation in a city with a shortage of affordable housing. I didn't know a soul in that country. Then, by the end of the academic year, I had lots of friends from all over the world and I spoke very fluent German. I'd also spent the spring holidays backpacking through Ireland and Britain. In a youth hostel in Stow on the Wold, I met the man I would later marry. After that, I decided I would stay in Europe and, apart from a brief interlude in California in 2001, I have lived all of my adult, post-university life on this side of the Atlantic.
This is much better than the first version. The reason it's better is that we have a sense of what's at stake for the main character.
Hi Michael
The brick was to prevent them from chewing their way out of the grave.
*Hang all your necklaces to prevent tangling.
I really like my employee, Kristin. She's the perfect mix of personable and professional. She has great style and is kind to Mister Boots.
In other news, I've got at least three more posts to write, and am falling behind. And it's likely to get worse, mostly because we had a baby boy Monday night, Thomas Walter, pictured below.
20.FUGAZI "Burning (Live)"
"Where else am I gonna hide all my money?"
23. Persons affected by the use of force and firearms or their legal representatives shall have access to an independent process, including a judicial process. In the event of the death of such persons, this provision shall apply to their dependants accordingly.
“I have, by announcing my stake in Envair, decided to be part of this new business (oil and gas) and over the next few months, combine our strengths, to build the business further,” Deepak said.
Heat olive oil in a large saucepan over medium heat. Add shrimp, season with salt & pepper and saute 1 minute, until shrimp are turning pink in color. Using slotted spoon, remove shrimp and transfer to a bowl. Set aside.
-the 12-year-old boy, who does weird things like earn and save $130 to purchase a light saber online;
I should know, I live in this land. The simple sentence “Seriously?...SERIOUSLY?” is now my favorite “say it in my head” saying.
*If you could change your name, what would you change it to?
Wynkoop Brewing Company Mile HI.P.A.
Having done my part to maintain our great democracy the way our founding fathers envisioned over two centuries ago (I added the part about dead squirrels myself; hope that doesn’t hurt my cred as a strict constructionist), I’m headed out the door as Sue has one final question for me.
(This article could make a good wedding card stuffer)
This is a simple tutorial how to transform socks into wrist-warmers.
What on earth is all that about?
While the consensus is that the Indian presence was certainly negligible and unreflective of their seven-plus percentage in the national population, the analyst said the Chinese on the contrary made an unusually strong showing.
DP from Pion Design
Leading lines help to bring a viewer into and through your image. A horizon, mountains, roads, building, or any other object that creates a line through the image can create these lines in your image. The s-curve is one of the most pleasing lines in an image.
and what of me?
The crowd was peaceful. People greet each other even though they do not know the person.
Fast forward to today, and Ross is arguably the hottest comedy act on the ‘big venue’ circuit. Married to an Australian, he has set himself up with the perfect life -- 6 months in Oz, six months in the UK -- and in both countries the majority of that time is spent on tour. It's genuinely what he loves to do.
Had so lit up the whole
Back it: Derry win. Usually promoted sides tend to suffer a ‘’welcome to the top flight’’ result. I feel this could be it. I don’t think it’ll be hammering by any stretch, but I can see Derry leaving with a win.
Lew Ja I Ja Dub by Kultura features on the Fala compilation from 1985 which, if I’m not mistaken, showcased punk and post punk bands originally released on Poland’s cassette only label of the same name.
A by product of the 2011 rules intended to ban the DDD, also stopped this open fronted diffuser solution. However the rules enforced the continuous surface only across a 90cm width of floor and the diffuser is allowed to be 100cm wide. Thus a 5cm window was allowed each side of the diffuser.
This isn't bad, and I know the comment column is clamoring to read this, but a query letter has to show me that you can write so well and so crisply that I will want to read this book more than once.
Porcello is 1-0, with a 1.83 ERA in his first two starts of 2012, that’s all you need to know about the Tigers, because this is a Rangers blog, duh.
Its that time of year... the time where the hint of summer is right around the corner, and its time to start planning for all the fun summer stuff... and you get all excited just thinking about it all!
Over the years, I’ve incorporated all of these platforms into my networking repertoire, with varying results. Here’s some of what I’ve learned about successful “technetworking”:
The contractors subsequently hire the transporters who then carry the goods.
The first step in the whole truth telling journey is speaking the truth and being fully authentic with ourselves and from there we are in a place to move and tell the truth to another. It really doesn’t matter what the other person thinks, says or responds, because essentially we are doing it a way to show more love to ourselves…..
Okay, okay…this isn’t a ‘normal’ pizza. It’s actually called socca, and traditionally it’s not topped with anything. Other names you might recognize it as are farinata (from Genoa) or cecina (from Tuscany). Typically, the term socca comes from the region of Nice. Now, you’re probably wondering, “has she ever been to any of these places?”.
Probably a year passed before the gentleman showed up at October Open Studios with two gorgeous but stained or punctured cashmere sweaters. Somehow, I'm not sure what happened, by the time he left I was consigned to making him a scarf with them. Oops.
Luckily my power must have come back during the night. It was like walking around a real horror movie the last 2 days. Pretty cool but man it sucked putting on make-up!! lol.
But let's just chat for a minute. How are you? How about the inevitable coming of fall? It rained almost all of this week which was glorious (I love the rain) but I couldn't completely enjoy it since I know that soon enough it will be snow and freezing temperatures. Sigh.
Tiny amt of black for eyes
Oliva A, Spira A, Multigner L. Contribution of environmental factors to the risk of male infertility. Hum Reprod 2001; 16: 1768-1776.
“Chunnie… I just dizzy… no need to go to doctor and get me down.”
So what does Anzac day mean now? What does it commemorate that so many Australians, and especially so many young Australians feel that it is ours, that it is theirs? ...
this year has flown by!! guess that is what happens when you are having fun!!!
Girls want to be accepted, appreciated, and liked. And when they don’t fit the criteria, some girls try to “fix” themselves. This can lead to eating disorders, dieting, depression, and low self esteem.
During its long and tortured history, the earth grew ever more exhausted by the depredations of its dwellers. As the sun darkened with age and exploitation, the earth cried out, but yet another round of savage warfare amongst the callous denizens drove the post-apocalyptic world to its last gasp of life. The air itself became a weapon in this final war until it too was burned up in unbounded wrath, stripping the earth of its protective embrace. The blade was lost during this time. It sank under the sands that drowned the doomed city of Nazerak when its last wielder, the mad Despot Zagnazerak fell at last into ruin and death.
So how did this story go so far? The following reconstruction is based on others' work, mostly 1) Egyptian journalist Sarah Carr, who posted a response to the Daily Mail article (which is now buried in a comments thread that runs to more than 800, but which she posted to Facebook for the record) and has since pursued the issue, blogger Zeinobia, who was also on the case early, and Murphy's previously cited CSM article. Carr, I think, nails the unspoken presumptions that helped spread the story:
Jesus warned, "But whoso shall offend one of these little ones which believe in me, it were better for him that a millstone were hanged about his neck, and that he were drowned in the depth of the sea." (Matt. 18:6)
For that, I will be eternally grateful.
I actually did make one or two friends there, one of which is still a very good friend, who left cadets not long after I did, and is now a happy green party supporting pagan dude. ;-)
1/4 cup minced shallot
Satisfied with the progress, we moved onto screen printing, and I used simple cut-out paper shapes to create this design.
Which is your favorite?:)
Three decades later, the bombing of Church Street in the South African capital of Pretoria took place on the 20th of May 1983, although it only killed 19 people it injured 217, many of whom left horrifically maimed for life. The South African Truth and Reconciliation Commission identified two of the heroes of the anti-Apartheid struggle Oliver Tambo and Joe Slovo as being primarily responsible for the bombing, however, in his autobiography “The long walk to Freedom” Nelson Mandela, who although in prison at the time, remained the head of the African National Congress (ANC) freely admits that he knew of the planned bombing in advance and “signed it off”.
You’re Hot shot’z mixed and ready
Since this event is sponsored by CouponCabin, we ask that your giveaway sponsor for this specific event not be in direct competition with them (ie. another coupon website).
The car was stolen from the wash bay that afternoon, the keys having been left in the ignition.
I know I should talk about what is going on with Bear right now. I want to but to tell you the truth, I find the thought of it purely exhausting. For nine years now it has been exhausting. Story simplified-I haven’t seen Bear in three weeks, Dustin hasn’t seen her in 4. My Uncle (who has custody) doesn’t like to deal with things and is telling us that Bear says she would like to spend more time with her bio Mom than us. Which we call bullshit on but welcome to the world where we honestly have no say. It is more convenient for him to use her Bio Mom and give in to her than anything else.
Once I became aware that all foods are not good for you, I changed our daily meals. I have become passionate about eating right and exercising, trying many form of exercise. I have discovered that I am a person that likes to be active. I enjoy aerobic, dance, P90X, yoga, walking, swimming, hiking, kayaking, and running. I need to be challenged and do best when I give myself goals. I realized a while back that if I think of exercise as only a way to lose weight then I am more likely to get burned out and look negative to the scale and daily workouts. Once I enjoyed the activity for the fun and feel of being active I found lacing up my shoes and gear a positive experience and looked forward to it. I realize that exercise is a way of life and relaxing to the body and mind. That is why I now enjoy running. I enjoy the beautiful landscape around me, the clean air through my lungs, and the nature I see all around me (minus the coyotes). I still enjoy other workouts but when the weather is nice I'll be out running.
And I was very proud of my work.
So now I thought may I'll give Craftroom a try.
The passion of love to all kind of small birds does not really leave me... I do love observing them and I can do it for hours. So as the act of it I have done some small romantic box again with a bird of course. Have a look at it pls..
Championship teams receiving parachute payments
- Kelly Clarkson - How Long Will it Take Her to Sing the National Anthem (From first note starts until she completes saying Brave), over/under 1:35. I think that's a bit long-- last year, Christina Aguilera sang the national anthem and I'd say she has a tendency to lengthen it out. I say Clarkson keeps it crisp. Under.
This exhibition will be held at the Northwest African American Museum (Which has an amazing history of it’s own). Located at 2300 South Massachusetts St. Seattle, Washington 98144. October 29, 2011-May 6, 2012.
The most expensive thing from the renovation were the knobs that I got from Antropologie (around $28 for all of them). Quite expensive for knobs but I was in love with that color! And finally I found the right place for those cute little birds that I got on sale at Michael's.
A blog I follow regularly, Danny’s Kitchen, posted a rather fun and interesting challenge that he is calling “The Great Leftover Challenge.” The rules of the game are:
The respectful Gate audience seemed to enjoy it although the two young women sitting next to me left, about a half hour in. They had been chatting throughout the movie – although they shushed when I shushed them, but only for seconds – so it’s unclear to me whether they found something here to dislike or just needed to talk more than they needed to watch a movie.
With that being said (one of my favorite phrases in the English language), I've narrowed the list down enough to where I can create a Top Ten list, in no particular order, that - goes without saying - is subject to change.
Made it fall out.
Yes my birthday was months ago but she gave me a voucher for zorbing (see here for info) and we finally did it together last weekend. It was really brilliant fun, we got absolutely drenched rolling down a big hill in a massive inflatable ball with water in it! I would recommend it to anyone though I was terrified!
SKOL!
MI Conversation Series with Slipknot available for streaming at:
This was such a bad decision.
I swear though as soon as we made the split aid stations were far and few between on the marathon course. Why would you do that to people? Well I turned around and ran in the sun for what seemed forever when in actuality I think it was just a few miles. I passed Steven on the out and back section and we waved. I could tell by his face he was still hurting pretty good. Crossing back over the interstate brought us back into downtown. At one point there was a lady passed out in the median with police helping her. I felt bad for her, but since I couldn’t help I had to continue running my own race. Passing the finish line was rather bitter sweet since I knew I still had 9 miles or so left before I could be back crossing the line.
7. Technology offers empowerment, not automation.
I’d like to give a wide angle view of the Lord’s Prayer in today’s post. We’ll take a more detailed look in the next couple of weeks.
And not like Grams’s style of neat and tidy. She flat-out told him that, with him not working, he wasn’t welcome. That he didn’t matter to her one whit and that she had no reason to allow him to stay in the house if he wasn’t contributing.
“Alex, all arguments about context and culture in the Bible aside, where the rubber meets the road is here: Genesis! It is as plain as the nose on your face that God made man and woman for each other… exclusively.”
Chapter 20
Can you make it through this 911 call? Can you? Can you tell me after you listen, that it is okay for our President and our Government to fund a trip of a cleric to raise money for this incredible slap in the face?
English and Drama student Katie Hodson seems bitter towards the Government’s student loans system,
After hanging up with the Tall Guy on Sunday night, two thoughts zipped through my head. First, I MUST find out how far away Oregon is and read a map once in a while. And Second…what on earth will I make for dinner…?
(Note: If you read salsa canning guides put out by the Extension Service, they are very concerned about maintaining the correct acidity and using 'research tested recipes' when using a boiling water bath for long term salsa storage. The recipe I have here is NOT a research tested salsa recipe. Please make and use this recipe using your good sense. If you ever have a canned product for which you find the lid is no longer vacuum sealed and 'pops' when you open it, throw the food item in the garbage!)
Here's are the answers to the questions asked in the giveaway:
Together, they flailed their hands in overt denial. “Naaah.”
While he is at work twiddling his thumbs, "on-call", waiting to be useful, I'm stuck at home with four kids going crazy. (My only chance to help so far has been to donate some food and clothing, and then hugging the girls and making a salad for their dinner that night! Which was awesome. Not trying to diminish that at all.)
For those unfamiliar with The Hardrock 100... it's web-site refers to it as a graduate level challenge for endurance runners. Just to be entered in the lottery you must complete one of nineteen other 100's deemed tough enough to qualify you. This year's race is scheduled for July 8, and is run through the San Juan Mountains of South West Colorado at an average elevation of 11,200 feet. The race boasts 68,000 vertical feet of elevation change split evenly between up and down. To put that in perspective; sea level to the top of Everest and back would be around 58,000 feet. Throughout the duration of the 101.3 miles, runners must climb above 12,000 feet 13 times, once climbing to 14,000 feet going over Handie's Peak. Even in July several of these passes will still be covered with snow.With a 48 hour time limit, the longest of any 100 miler in the US, the average finishing rate is an encouraging 72% run in an average time of 41:10.
* Wendie Malick as Dr. Rubin
I must say I am usually underwhelmed by wedding fairs but Luella's has style. Oh so much style. It is just so refreshing to meet suppliers who actually want to be part of your day. For me enthusiasm is just as important as style.
The following is extracted from the introduction to the appendix:
So, if you have already secured permission to use the characters in your book, and you might have, that's the information you start with. If you haven't you're going to be hard pressed to find anyone who's going to keep reading.
Happy Tuesday! This is a fun easel card that I'm thinking of entering into one of this week's Just Magnolia Challenges. I'll just have to figure out how to do that. (Remember, I'm not exactly a computer wizard!) I had such a fun time making this card...Cardstock (vanilla & creamy caramel) is from Stampin-Up. Designer paper is from Tapestry/C.R. Gibson, and K&Company. Ribbon, flowers, & pearls came from my stash! I used Copics to color Tilda as follows:
The first recipe was actually chosen by Dorie Greenspan herself, and was super easy to make. This is good, because it did not deter me from making future things. (I should note that I will not be participating every week. Some foods are way too expensive for me. Some foods I will not eat. Mushrooms are the devil.)
What is a Personality Cult? A personality cult, or as Wikipedia likes to call it, a “Cult of personality”, is when an individual person creates an overwhelmingly positive idyllic perspective of him or herself, through bucketloads of praise and flattery. Examples of personality cults include those happy little gophers Stalin, Hitler, Pol Pot, Mao and a couple of Egyptian pharoahs who weren’t cats.
For something that was originally a natural product, this stuff has certainly come a long way!
“Yes, can I order about three hundred bulbs for my office, please?”
But 40. Forty is a time to reflect on how much youth you wasted, all the doors you've closed, a time to feel the creaks in your joints and examine the wrinkles on your neck - when did those get there? Your children are older and snottier and demanding more of your money and sucking you of your innate protective tendencies. Your parents are older and dottier and demanding you clean their bathrooms after you've picked up their prescriptions.
I continue to practice the 66-move main form of Liuhebafa daily (and to discover new parts of myself in the process) down at the oceanfront park near my home in Nanaimo, BC.
La Condamine stayed here with the Jesuits when he arrived bedraggled in Quito behind the first wave of the French Geodesic expedition that left France in 1735. Their mission was the accurate mapping of the equator and measuring the length of a latitudinal meridian. They recorded a great deal of flora, much of which was lost at sea, or during arduous travel.
“Can not – or May not?” I ventured boldly.
lead us to respect your world,
Working hard to lay claim to the island, the English evicted the Irish owners and bestowed these lands on primarily Scottish lords with similar religious allegiance as the English. But it should be noted that the Irish are a patient folk, if a bit hot-tempered. They bided their time. They planned. They kept the spirit of freedom alive until finally, the time came for them to take back their land. All did not go as planned or expected, unfortunately, and six of Ireland’s northern counties were retained by England. Many in Northern Ireland who maintained continued allegiance to the Republic felt abandoned by their southern brothers and sisters.
I can’t tell you what they thought, and I’ve no idea if there’s a need for replacing anyone in the show… But what I can tell you is that I had even more fun this year then I did last year. I felt more connected and strong with my performance of my song, AND… I really enjoyed myself inside the audition scene… And since it’s a comedy, I can only imagine that the increase in laughs from the previous year could only be thought of as a “good thing.”
And the faith of these two men...I mean, seriously. We've experienced some hard times. We've chosen to live out-of-the-box lives. We've accepted the call to let God choose our family size, to homeschool our children and we've questioned those calls. When my husband lost his job, that was hard. The past year, we have relied upon an almost non-existant income due to his new job being 100% commission and having to build a clientele from nothing. And that was hard. Making promises to debtors, not knowing if we can keep them...walking into a free Christmas Toy Store put on by our church not to give, but to receive...that was hard. But we've never gone without a meal or slept on asphalt, and yet I've still questioned God. Things seem to be looking up for us financially, as Chad is (not surprisingly to me) doing excellent at his work, but what if that ends too. Can I trust God in every circumstance and most importantly, can I find contentment there? I don't think I've done a very good job of being content so far.
JS – Thank you, I’m happy to be here.
I waste a lot of time reading blogs and I mean a lot of time. I love the clever ones with multiple links,the erudite ones and the guilt inducing ones that demand I lend support to obscure causes. I adore the witty ones and the bitchy ones, but most of all I like the ones that read like a private diary, that let you in to a secret life.
Opposition leader Anwar Ibrahim said earlier that the demonstrators were intent on marching to the square.
It would be impossible to discuss the history of the pill without mentioning one of its staunchest supporters, Margaret Sanger, who is often trotted out by Planned Parenthood opponents for her eugenicist views. A longtime birth control activist who was once jailed for her defiance of the Comstock laws, Sanger believed that women should have access to contraceptives, and according to May, imagined a birth control pill as early as 1912. It wasn’t until 1950 that the dream came closer to reality, however; her friend and fellow activist Katharine Dexter McCormick offered financial support for research into a birth control pill, and the women set out to find people who could help them achieve their goals.
We pile our plates and take a seat upstairs. Several boutique beers are available on tap - I have the Naked for Satan Ale ($5.50/$8), Suze has the Fat Yak ($8) and Minh gets into the Dirty Granny apple cider ($5.50/$8). Three craft beers from Victoria are on offer: Boatrocker Pilsener, 3 Ravens White and Kooinda Pale Ale ($8.50 each).
How do you teach compare and contrast?
Gather a shelter in place kit.
Let cool for 5 minutes. Season with salt and pepper and fold in mayonnaise and sour cream. Chill before serving.
Thanks for visiting and hope you have a great weekend :-) :-)
The following General Objections and Responses apply to each individual Request in the Document Request, whether or not such Objections and Responses are repeated below in response to each individual Request.
I hope you had a wonderful Sunday.
Thanks for your visit! I love reading all of your comments, they really brighten up my day :)
Lockhart, Texas 78644
Couples who’ve survived a potentially marriage-ending situation, such as infidelity or a life-threatening disease, may continue to battle years of built-up resentment, anger or bitterness.
When I was 12, my grandfather gave me and one of my friends a ride home from summer camp on an 80 degree day. He rolled up all the windows, turned on big band music, and turned up the heat. As embarrassing as it was for both of us to fall asleep, I’m just glad that we didn’t die of heat exhaustion.
We went to a story time this morning and the organic market. I “sampled” quite a few bulk bin items like yogurt covered almonds, dark chocolate espresso beans, and a couple more. Then we went to walmart to pick up a few baby items for one of the families in need who recently lost their Marine. She is left to raise a 3 month old by herself so I bought her some feeding items like spoons, bowls, sippy cups, etc. Even though he is a little young for them now, a couple months will fly by and she will need all those things which may be the last thing on her mind. My heart aches for her.
“I’m nobody I’m I’m…” My heart plunged into the ground.
Day 06 – A book that makes you sad
Yet despite his nation's debt to America, Europe and nations that went out of their way to oppose apartheid, Mandela has been hugely critical of the West, associating instead with its enemies.
-I was using bleach in the bathroom the other day to clean something and he was right behind me watching. I kept asking him to leave the room because I didn’t think he should be inhaling bleach fumes. I told him to go in the den because this stuff really stinks and he said, “I know…it smells really, really yucky. It is making the boogers fall out of my nose”. I can assure you, he did not pick up that on from me.
However, for me, my blog is one of my small businesses.
So a bit of a beauty update, and some other stuff...!
From the advertisements, I learned about local businesses I didn't know about.
Remember the photos I posted from Kat and Mike's Wedding? We'll, there's a new addition to their family!!
Another week. Another menu. I had a lovely weekend away with friends so I should be all charged up for the week but I'm not so sure I'm feeling it. Maybe I needed another day or two away.
The Home Store
So I'm to be Queen o' the May, mother, I'm to be Queen o' the May."
Najib said that in line with the 1Malaysia concept of “People First, Performance Now,” he had told the Cabinet that government institutions were created to protect the people’s rights and interests, and as such they cannot act against or neglect these interests or act beyond the country’s laws and Constitution.
I’m not very adventurous when it comes to chickens as you know. I like the Cornish Cross, and have been very happy with the Black Sex Links as layers. No need to color code my laying flock anymore, like we used to, so sticking with this breed in fine with me. I also can’t say enough about buying from a hatchery that has been in business for a long time. We used to get our chicks from a hatchery in Washington and when high feed prices drove them to retirement, we switched to this hatchery on the recommendation of a friend. The chicks are always in good shape when they arrive and do well here.
Happy Monday, Everyone! I hope you all had a wonderful weekend!
I would like to enter into the following challenges:
I have received some feedback regarding the watermark I have now added to my photos. I thank you for your views and I have certainly taken them on board. I have now decided on a less intrusive watermark....but sadly the watermark will stay! Let me say that it makes me very sad to have had to add this to my photos, but it makes me even sadder to see my photos on Etsy for sale!!
survivors moved to g bay
Christine Blower
chipotles in adobo (2 teaspoons minced, or more to taste)
Philly Pressbox would like to thank our Sponsor, Shop.com.
insinuates a deadly carcinogen
Well, unless he’s Bernie Madoff, he’s not being picked on in any meaningful way at all, except that the President has (rightly) noted that the peculiar incentives of Wall Street, combined with a lack of regulation and, um, morality (my word) led to the collapse of the global financial system, and lots of people had to bail Wall Street out. Kinsley’s friend may not have caused the crisis, but neither did I, and yet Republicans in this country seem to be saying that the only people who SHOULDN’T have to chip in to knock down the deficits that came out of that collapse, two wars that were bought on credit, a Medicare benefit that was charged as well, and tax cuts that disproportionately benefitted the top tier of earners in this country is…that same top tier.
Joss Whedon, the director of The Avengers movie, and the man behind such cult hits as Firefly, Dollhouse, Buffy, and Dr. Horrible’s Sing-Along-Blog, even said, “It was a story about broken people. It was a story about what we’ve lost what we used to have culturally, in terms of the sense of community, this sense of helping one another, this sense of self-sacrifice. ”
Dan Brown’s mega-bestseller, The Da Vinci Code, surely shares part of the credit. This publishing phenomenon, which sold over 6 million copies, took a simmering interest in the Knights Templar, the Divine Feminine, alleged secret societies such as the Priory of Sion, the Holy Grail, and the question of the historical Jesus, and stirred these ingredients together with a generous dollop of Gnosticism.
However, the biggest draw here is the music, and with some luck, on a good day, one can find a virtual festival of professional talent. So it was that on Saturday and Sunday, I was lured in by the music of Jessy Carolina and the Hot Mess. I found myself listening for hours along with a large steady crowd who found themselves so engaged that many resorted to Dancing in the Streets. From their website:
Why must this be so difficult? Ah yes, it’s all due to filming on a micro-budget. Would money really solve the problems, or would new ones arise, but I’d have the worries spread between a larger crew base.
Prep the kebabs:
I really like it because first of all, it's red and also it reminds me a little of Christmas and you know how I love Christmas decorations. Maybe I'll find the time to make some things for next year, in the meantime I'm already planning a "Springtime/Easter" little tableau!
amongst the shadows. The street was dark, hiding the homeless that used doorways
See ya soon!
She has until the end of April to come up with an answer.
The Court has also declared that the complaint has alleged and focused upon “one specific fundamental legal right — the right to a balanced and healthful ecology” (Decision, p. 14). There is no question that “the right to a balanced and healthful ecology” is “fundamental” and that, accordingly, it has been “constitutionalized.” But although it is fundamental in character, I suggest, with very great respect, that it cannot be characterized as “specific,” without doing excessive violence to language. It is in fact very difficult to fashion language more comprehensive in scope and generalized in character than a right to “a balanced and healthful ecology.” The list of particular claims which can be subsumed under this rubic appears to be entirely open-ended: prevention and control of emission of toxic fumes and smoke from factories and motor vehicles; of discharge of oil, chemical effluents, garbage and raw sewage into rivers, inland and coastal waters by vessels, oil rigs, factories, mines and whole communities; of dumping of organic and inorganic wastes on open land, streets and thoroughfares; failure to rehabilitate land after strip-mining or open-pit mining; kaingin or slash-and-burn farming; destruction of fisheries, coral reefs and other living sea resources through the use of dynamite or cyanide and other chemicals; contamination of ground water resources; loss of certain species of fauna and flora; and so on. The other statements pointed out by the Court: Section 3, Executive Order No. 192 dated 10 June 1987; Section 1, Title XIV, Book IV of the 1987 Administrative Code; and P.D. No. 1151, dated 6 June 1977 — all appear to be formulations of policy, as general and abstract as the constitutional statements of basic policy in Article II, Section 16 (“the right — to a balanced and healthful ecology”) and 15 (“the right to health”).
The first thing I did was to cut a little off both sides, to bring the focus in closer to the figure. What bothered me most about it, though, was that it had a "velvet Elvis-y" kind of feel, and overall was far too contrasty. I thought it might help to lighten the value of the water surrounding the figure, so I added some green paper which appeared to be pretty translucent- until the glue dried. It turned disgustingly pastel-ish and opaque. It's hard to tell from the photo just how horrible it was, but trust me- yuk!
I hope scanning my laptop fixes it. I hope the virus will be deleted permanently. I hope it don’t damage anything on my files, in short, my whole PC!
1) Soak the sultanas with the dessert wine for at least 2hrs or preferably overnight.
Yes, the usage of cellular phones is more than a manic fad, but an adapted lifestyle to an ever changing time. We are more than adapted in fact we are attached to its easy and convenient use. With its amazing features adding only to the prestige of owning it, it above all satisfies human need for connection. Constantly as you use them each day, you’ll be faced inevitably with various situations. Sometimes out of the blue an unknown number calls anonymously to site an example. Maybe for some unknown reasons as well your mobile phone messes up losing your matched names and numbers. It may sound trifling yet you may also expect a possible worse.
In my humble opinion, what SHOULD have happened, is they should have gotten our fridge on the very next truck leaving that warehouse and brought it to us at a time-frame we chose, not them. Why? Because we already arranged our schedule to meet them the first time, it is their turn. It is called CUSTOMER SERVICE. We paid you, now you deliver. Secondly, I know that Monday was an option because it was a date would could have picked when we originally chose the date.
feels like home to me
33. Seen Niagara Falls in person
Friedman: we should raise gas taxes
Think about it… if you want to change your body, you don’t just go the gym once and expect to be changed forever do you? No, to train a muscle you have to repeat your exercise over and over.
I am a part of joy and a part of sorrow.
The work, curated by Olivier Berggruen, Associate Curator, Schirn Kunsthalle Frankfurt, is beautifully presented here. The soft grey, not white, gallery walls, cause the stark blackness of the "SAMO" images, as well as the Mediterranean blues and blood reds of other works here, to stand out in beautiful relief.
On 7/7 the emergency services were conducting an exercise to test their response to a terrorist attack……
Stranglers Always the sun UK
With my boots full of dew from the lush meadow green,
I think that sometimes I forget how much Jesus loves me. Even when man fails us he is there and he loves us so much more than any man could. What man is willing to die for you?
A long-time resident of Cois Fharraige, Connemara, Davnet Heery enjoys solitary walks along the shore and on the bog, day-dreaming. Recently graduated from the MA in Writing at NUIG she has had a giddy summer reading at literary festivals countrywide for the launch of the class anthology Bicycles with Umbrellas. Primarily a poet (she has been grant aided by Galway Co.Co. to work towards a collection Camellia) she also enjoys writing plays. Her short story The Little Girl in Pink was short-listed for The Francis Mc Manus award, 2011.
California has for decades used long-term segregation to combat gang violence in its prisons, says the New York Times. Thousands of inmates said to have gang ties have been sent to solitary confinement for years, or in some cases decades. California corrections officials – prodded by two hunger strikes by inmates last year and the advice of national prison experts – has proposed changes in the gang policy that could decrease the number of inmates in isolation.
After a few minutes, I made my morning pilgrimage downstairs to the grocery store I work above to get some breakfast and something to drink. I rode the escalator from the parking garage into the store, and as I got to the top I heard, "How I wish, how I wish you were here..." It was playing on the store's public address system. I have been in this store at least 5,000 times, and I have never EVER known them to play Pink Floyd. This wasn't an accident. This was him letting me know he's with me. He can feel my heartache. He knows I miss him. He's watching out for me. He was right there next to me. I could feel him.
“Oh, I recognize the face from your album cover. You’re a little gray around the edges, but I’d know you anywhere - your face is burned into my brain.”
Tupper tipped his head to one side. “So it is purple?”
Today the sun is shining, time to get to work in the garden and vegetable patch, so I needed a dish that I could forget about for a while. This recipe from my old favourite, the BBC Good Food Website, seemed to fit the bill. I did change it slightly as several people commented on the sauce being very sticky and leaving them with some scary washing up. Not for me, I thought, and worked around it.
Visitors are encouraged to wander through the orchard garden created back in the late 1940s and 1950s by Grace and Arthur Mitchell.
Gupster 5 has been designed on the basis of the shortcomings of the previous 4. The cameras have been evolving for years, and the new dual colour system has proved it’s worth in Belize and Mexico - to film things no one has ever filmed before. Now we want it to show us things no one has seen before.
Part of this is down to the steep decline in the volume of output. Nowadays, there’s much, much less beer advertising around than there used to be. That means the odds of a great campaign emerging have lengthened dramatically. In the last decade, the global mega-brewery has also arisen. Mergers and consolidation has meant that beers that were previously supported with TV advertising have been milked and had their investment withdrawn as clients have concentrated their attention on the leading brands in their portfolio.
Crest Rinse $0.25/1
They all had a blast.
Currently, Sarawak has six political parties namely Parti Pesaka Bumiputera Bersatu (PBB), Sarawak United People’s Party (SUPP), Parti Rakyat Sarawak (PRS), Sarawak Progressive Democratic Party (SPDP) – all in the BN coalition, and the opposition parties comprise State Reform party (STAR) and Sarawak National Party (SNAP).
Unfortunately, instead of the little plain, glazed ones I asked for, he came home with cheese filled giant globs of ick! Under normal circumstances I may have enjoyed 1 of these. Too late to go back, but of course a sane person would have just abandoned that particular challenge.
Right? The double digitness rather than triple digitness makes it OK?
2-6 Jungle Free-bass
As you climbed aboard and waved good-bye, I felt a lump in my throat and tears stung my eyes.
i love all these, theyre so nice!
The following is a quote from Michael Hardman, one of the original four founders of CAMRA back in 1971. Talking to the FT last week, what do you possibly think he could mean when he says:
Well an earring organizer of course!
Anyway, I have an organizational project that I've been working on and wanted to share. You may have thought you had seen enough of my "Studio," but (sigh)......there is more! If you missed the two previous posts, you can check them out HERE & HERE. When I did my previous tours of my favorite room in the house, I was desperately needing additional storage in my studio closet, so I steered clear of sharing that space with you. Then The Man took pity on me (aka: tired of me nagging) & helped me put together what I needed. Since I've been told that I make my posts too long, I really tried to do fewer pics, but I don't think I was very successful......lol! Come on, let's look around!
It is the alliance of these two well known populist leaders that is so enticing to the aspiring politicians in both local and national levels, the re-electionists and to some ‘comebacking’ politicians, who wants to ride on the popularity of Estrada and Binay.
no wars
And so they set out upon a long and adventurous journey, their highway was the river and their steed was a dug out canoe. After many days of travel through the enchanted forest, they arrived at a small village and were invited to rest and share the food with the people of the enchanted forest.
God created men and women to live in harmony with each other, to fill needs in each other that they didn't even know were there.
Leaked details about the game indicate you’ll be able to play through the entire story with a friend (who can drop in and out of the game at any time). Series protagonist Isaac Clarke will be joined by a fellow engineering-suit enthusiast with a distinctive scar and glowing red eyes. This so-far-unnamed man is your guide in the singleplayer mode but in co-op the story undergoes minor tweaks to accommodate him as a playable character.
When I found myself writing about the music, I found myself with few words since I did not really remember that much about the music. I had to listen to it again, and after doing so I realised something – it’s far from great, but it is definitely good. It adds to the atmosphere, but it can’t really “become” the atmosphere in my eyes. It only works as a supplement, and as that role it does quite well. To put it simply – I might not have remembered the music that well, but I definitely remembered the atmosphere in some of the scenes.
'Today while waiting in line at Gamestop, I overheard the cashier and another customer chatting about how Poke'mon was for kids and anyone who's into it over 10 is weird...I put my Poke'mon game back on hte shelf and snuck out of the store'.
WFTDA is now about to implement a gender policy for inter-league play that is far more inclusive than DC Rollergirls’ original code of conduct, a policy that is a testament to the increased visibility and acceptance of transgender rollergirls within WFTDA since I began skating in 2008. WFTDA’s policy for the first time officially recognizes the contributions of transgender women to the sport of roller derby, and should serve as an example to other sports as well. By not relying on surgical status in its definition of “female,” and instead relying on the testimony of an athlete’s healthcare provider as to whether or not that athlete’s hormone levels are within a “medically acceptable” range for a female, WFTDA’s gender policy leaves a lot of flexibility in its definition of gender, and is far more inclusive than that of almost all professional sports. But it also far from perfect, and it is my hope that it will be revised after implementation to be more inclusive, and furthermore, that any policy regulating hormone levels will apply equally to cisgender and transgender women, rather than singling out transgender women over concerns about how hormone levels affect athletic competitiveness.
You try it!
the rock wall caked with slippery mud? thanks be unto Kater Hater for the much needed boost.
Jesus redefines the disciple-teacher relationship in John 15:14-17. His disciples are no longer to be his servants, they are his friends. We tend to read the word “friend” through the grid of contemporary friendships, that Jesus is a sort of “best friend” (or as my daughters say, Jesus is out BFF). Despite the popularity of this mental picture, it waters down what Jesus is saying so much that we are in danger of losing his point.
A2 Trust Me I'm A Doctor 3:12
Ok so I get that its all trendy and whatever to bash social networking sites like you're above all that shit or whatever- but I don't understand why people are always complaining about Facebook statuses and Twitter updates saying stuff they don't care about. You know how people are always like "I don't care if you're waiting for the bus!" or "Why do I have to read that you're brushing your teeth??" etc.
Let me get back to searching for those poems.
I’m just being honest, I don’t like you…
Fat Jack’s Comicrypt not only has some of the best back issues of any store, but also has the added bonus of cute animals in the form of the cats that live at the store.
But as it turns out, three years later the business has failed...even though we thought we were being obedient to His will for us. Does this mean that God has failed US? Why did He choose to allow us to face these circumstances?
6 April
Apalachi (2nd), Vic Venturi (UR 20th); 2011 In Compliance 13th: Vic Venturi (BD 2nd)
Thanks so much for stopping by today. I love to read your comments, so keep them coming :)
· 123 Clermont Ave between Myrtle & Park Avenues.
As I was putting the oatmeal away I knocked a brand new jar of blueberry syrup out of the cabinet.
After all, when I started in journalism, on my first day, I was told I MUST keep all my old shorthand notebooks. It turned out the company had an injunction against it by an unmentionable firm, due to some rather sloppy reporting and editing, so it was decreed ever afterwards that all notebooks should be kept for centuries.
And it doesn’t much matter that whether you provide a product or service either. We all know how much Apple pays attention to the user or customer experience. Every detail of the path their customer takes has been designed and engineered to provide a great and positive experience for the Apple customer. And yes, Apple spends plenty on traditional advertising and marketing. But I’m willing to bet that the experience of buying from Apple and then working with their products sells more product than the advertising does.
2 oz walnuts, chopped
52 hours of pathology lab
We left Adelaide fairly early and drove to the Barossa along Gorge Rd, which was very spectacular, through the Torrens Valley, Birdwood and Springton to Eden Valley, which is near where the cottage is. It is on 10 acres and they have done heaps of work planting trees on the upper part of the property and vines and a garden closer to the house. The cottage is old – 1860s I think – with the very thick stone walls. We had a lovely egg and bacon pie for lunch at the old kitchen table, had a look around the property and then went to Yalumba for some tasting on the way into Anguston. Yalumba was grand and manicured. The wine did not match the surrounds in quality but fortunately not in price either. Anguston was a pleasant little town with nice old buildings, an excellent playground and what looked like a good bookshop. We went to the Angus Park dried fruit shop, which had lots of yummy, sugary things and a good cheap cookbook, which in May I’ve still yet to try but definitely plan to do so.
Numbers 23; 19 “God is not a man that he should lie, neither the son of man that he should repent, hath he said and shall he not do it?.
Dining out is an often expensive, always ephemeral experience. In truth, there are other irresistibles in the world to put our hard-earned money towards. However, there are certain occassions when MoMo & Coco do not mind digging a little deeper into our clutch purses, and in doing so, we usually receive the opportunity to indulge in especially unforgettable treats of sweet irresistibles.
So, the first surprise is that Kirk got around to writing a blog post. Moving on…
Have an inspiring and passionate weekend! xox
Original language:
Amid the roar of guns that split the air,
I found out about this unique catalog last year and think I could spend every last cent within its pages. Celebrity chefs including Michael Symon have mentioned the famous deli in Michigan as well as their monthly clubs and gift boxes. Michael is a self-professed bacon fiend and belongs to the bacon club; but there are many other fun and delicious options including brownies {which I sent to a relative and they loooved} and rare olive oils.
Like all children, Tars had been placed in a crèche soon after birth, beginning the long Barsoomian version of Schwarze Pädagogik (poisonous pedagogy). Even his early activities were directed play, activity with a purpose. By the time actual lessons began he'd already been tentatively tracked and slotted based on early testing, both passive and active. He was mentally and physically well above average and always met or exceeded those early metrics. Young Barsoomians competed at everything all the time.
Because they do only that themself can do it.
Mr. Ulman...Tom Noonan
Soldiers no doubt have that feeling when coming home from war or a long deployment away. Just to have that chance to hug and feel a sense of peace and belonging.
I’m going to tell you a secret. It’s a deep, dark, cobweb-covered secret that you have to promise not to tell anyone. Promise? Are you ready for this? First, let’s set the scene …
3/4 cup finely ground turbinado sugar
My husband, myself and our children would ride most of this area every second weekend when they were small when we used to go and stay with my parents.
1. A job for my husband and any potential move done.
That bit I get, I really do, there are days when I just order a pint, drink it and order another because I've got better things to concentrate on than the delicate earthy aroma of the East Kent Goldings (for example!), but her attack on brewers and beer writers that are innovating is either deliberately provocative or the mark of someone who has become overly cynical about the industry they work in.
Heard You Wanna Beat Me Up – Strange Boys
HOLEY SHAMOLEY.
I always seem to pack my makeup like I pack my clothes. I bring way too much. More than I will ever actually wear. I have to do this though, I need to feel like I have variety and options to pick from.
including all four of the illustration designs
Other features
on to a receding future, nor hankering after
Saying cheese, final friend
1) I love me some Pokemon – Oh, that’s right. I’d be willing to throw an elbow into the eye of a eight year old kid just to get the last copy of a Pokemon game. I’m a gamer at heart, and I know far too much about the world of Pocket Monsters. I play it regularly, and I play it with vigor and excitement. It’s addicting. It’s like cocaine, only you can’t get a hooker’s panties off with a Pikachu.
When the smoking ban came in, and I still saw smoker friends from time to time, I usually found that they weren’t doing very much better than I was. It was the same story everywhere. People stayed home. And they stopped seeing old friends as regularly as they once had. But then, after a while, when I hadn’t seen them for a year or more, I no longer knew how they were doing at all.
Second, and I bring this up to many students as a college speaker, is to work a very simple pitch that has links, not attachments and is formatted in an easy and respectful read.
Pristavni 2
Across the river, as one slips
DEAR PAUL: There are a few possibilities. The first is that the air conditioner is in need of service or repair. To check this, place your hand over one of the air registers to see if the system is producing cold air or simply recirculating the room temperature air. Another possibility is that the unit is undersized for your home. Either of these conditions warrant attention by a licensed heating, ventilation and air conditioning (HVAC) contractor. A third possibility is that your attic is poorly vented, insufficiently insulated, or both.
Every day of my life was recorded in your book.
exposes the film
Where more than one are gathered, therein is created a greater and more potent power to effect the most incredible and comprehensive changes ever thought could happen. You are the Light of the World and by your Light, the Light within others is igniting in an unstoppable journey that has the entire Universe watching with bated breath.
‘Sure.’ She follows me to the kitchen where I put on the kettle. ‘Speaking of tea,’ she says, ‘Had some with my sister yesterday.’
Next entry - Maryland again!
Outasight – Figure 8 (Warner Brothers)
I love when I see lots of options in one genre pop up around the same time. It means that all the competitors have to step up to really grab an audience, and consquently, it’s market share. It’s why I’m thrilled that the MOBA genre is finding new players, and returning old ones, all the time. The communal bar keeps getting raised with each release, and unique ideas or takes on any design is seen and implemented (not always for the better). Refinement and perfection as the grinding stones of competition make each game better.
But I hope not!
BUY IT:
You will enjoy the book with the intense action and how Anita is getting back into the field playing one of the boys but with her own twist.
Advertising: 3
4. Add the boiled rajma, salt and the dry spice powders and sprinkle a little water. Stir and simmer for 4-5 minutes. Keep the consistency thick.
Mobile phone videos showed him still alive at that point.
Shasta Daisy
Enough fanboy wibbling! You want to know if it’s any good. Well, as I say, I overpraised the first Hulk at the time, which makes me cautious when it comes to this one. I will say Yes, it’s pretty good, in an unpretentious, CGI-heavy way. There are nice performances from Norton and Liv Tyler as his sweetheart, some amusing gags about stretchy trousers, and – as connoisseurs of the sublime Transporter series will know – while Leterrier may struggle a bit when it comes to character scenes and, to be honest, dialogue, he absolutely knows what he’s up to when it comes to doing action sequences. (Part of me thinks it’s a shame that Jason Statham isn’t in this movie, too – on the other hand, the Hulk’s hard, but he’s not that hard.)
1 exactly
The story is much more compelling than I originally expected. I couldn't believe how gory and incredible the descriptions of certain scenes were, and I can honestly say that the first description of Anna made my skin crawl. Theseus Cassio, or better known as Cas, constantly moves from town to town, making it his job to kill the particularly harmful undead. He knows all the right places to look in order to find Anna Korlov, who was once an innocent teenage girl, but is now a deadly creature you'd never want to mess with. From the moment they meet during an immature prank, she chooses to spare his life even though his plans are a bit different for her.
6 Kitchen
Red Pepper Flakes
Will it be you? It sure won't, unless you sign up! Just send me an email already!! All I need to know is that you'll race with us March 1-15th! Get a group of friends and make it FUN!
At a time when the largest theaters in Manhattan were all below 14th Street, the 3,200-seat Niblo's Garden on Prince and Broadway was one of the largest and most popular. In fact, it wasn't merely a theater but an entertainment park of mid-19th century fancies. William Niblo, an upper class PT Barnum of sorts, opened his version of a showy Las Vegas hotel in 1828, with elaborate gardens, gaslight illumination shows, vivid dioramas, traveling circuses, fireworks displays, and plenty of open saloons to keep his patrons happy. A theater was included in this complex, for many years one of the most popular amusements in the city.
South Africa, meanwhile, given over by F.W. de Klerk and Pik Botha to the Marxist African National Congress, has turned into a cauldron of murder, rape, AIDS and anarchy.
1:40 - Stop off at treasurer's house and end up talking for a while
Nonstick cooking spray
ABV: 5.5%
Juan Sheng is a member of Emily's List, an organization dedicated to encouraging more women to run for public office. She also was encouraged to run for public office by Senator Kirsten Gillbrand. Ms. Sheng participated in Senator Kirsten Gllibrand's "Off the Sidelines" program which also encourages women to run for public office. Thus, it is very ironic that the candidate endorsed by Emily's List, Grace Meng, should be the person challenging Ms. Sheng's designating petition and attempting to throw her out of the race. "If Emily's List really is interested in more women running for public office, why is it that the candidate they endorsed is challenging the designating petitions of an Emily's List member?" asked Ms. Sheng.
Half-crazed with success, we went across the street to the Costa Mesa Barnes & Noble (which is all of two miles from the Huntington Beach Barnes & Noble). No dice--and they didn't have it at all. "Not every place has it," the clerk told me as he scanned his computer screen, "they only have copies at Huntington Beach and Irvine and Aliso Viejo and Orange and Tustin and Fullerton and Long Beach." Which amounts to seven of the ten stores within 15 miles of my house, which I would call not too shabby.
I promised myself then that I was never going to let you go even if it meant I never had the last piece of pie. Since that moment three years ago, we’ve always been together even when we’ve been apart. It was so easy once you finally realized that you loved me, too.
When I put my Mrs. Snipe or Pocket Monkey as a victim, I hope to God someone will intervene. On that level, I feel it is only right for me to intervene on someone’s behalf. I believe in that case, it would be prudent to leave the weapon concealed until it becomes necessary. Feel free to add your .02 in the comments section.
In celebration of SUKKOT
Poor girl, she was just trying to be sweet.
I'll put up some more pictures, observations and memories, and will complete the set of links to photos (in the file linked up near the title of this page), but for now I'm going to have a green chile chicken enchilada and other familiar foods.
of boundless happiness.
Don’t get me wrong, there are amazing blog-writers, journalists and artists and production companies working on the web. And some pearls of sites. But I mean, the web is not yet used as a blank canvas, for an artist to rise to make it its own. It is not about drive-by information like Twitter or Facebook. It is about something unique, and addictive, and something that creates awe.
Look at the MIC under Tan Sri V. Manickavasagam and Tun V.T. Sambanthan. MIC was solid because of the leaders. It was strong. Same with Tun Tan Siew Sin. He took care of our money as finance minister. Not just the Chinese respected him, even the Malays.
I got my hair tinted 3 shades lighter a few weeks ago, nothing dramatic
Strength: Basketball is a simple sport. If you have a great player than you ride that player until the wheels fall off. That’s exactly what I expect South Dakota St to do with Nate Wolters. Wolters can do just about anything on a basketball court and his all-around game has led the Jackrabbits to their first ever tournament. He’s the type of player who can make a name for himself a la Harold Arceneaux. He’s gonna make SDSU dangerous to play.
HAM Voulez-vous? IS
But if this is a biomarker of the most aggressive cancer, then we can have a better treatment protocol and save millions of dollars in public health by not treating people who don’t need treatment as early, and really change the way we treat prostate cancer.
6. Attend a little league game
(Note: The listings on this link for the most part do not show the real, actual original asking price or first listing date. That coveted, hard-to-cobble-together information is listed below.)
Over the years, people have asked me how our expat life came about. I have had mixed reactions to my answers. "For heaven sake, how could you?" is what one woman said to me as she exclaimed that she would never allow it. I suddenly felt very sorry for her husband. Others would gladly pack their bags and be on the next plane out. If presented the opportunity, you have to think long and hard about what it means to you and your family. It is not a decision to make lightly and there is no right or wrong answer. It is a personal choice and sometimes you just have to hope you made the right one.
Any please stay tuned if you can, thank-you again, love and peace to you, your families and all.
Merry & Bright by Little by Little Designs
I have never given a radio interview before and so was pretty nervous. It didn't help that it was going to be live rather than a pre-recorded interview, but I figured it was exactly the stuff that I know about, so I was happy to do it. The process was interesting.
Result in an Injury or Illness
As always, I encourage readers to see specimens, make observations and come to your own conclusions. Test. Test. And test again.
Recipe: Posterboard Alphabet stamp set
UCONN Women's basketball has been undefeated for 78 games (I know a stat)! Let me tell you non-sports women, this is a BIG DEAL! In an interview with Maya Moore (that is right, I know her name!), after she led her team in a turnaround win against Stanford to take home the National Championship Trophy, ESPN asked her about what the season has been like for her. She stated that with so many critics and people doubting them that the hardest and most important part of their game has been consistency. She also mentions that to play well they couldn't question themselves and to play in fear but to love the game, play their heart out, and play with confidence.
Yauch is survived by his wife Dechen Wangdu and daughter, Tenzin Losel Yauch.
The name was not an LSD allusion but inspired by the surrealists' fondness for swigging absinthe with a sugarcube between the teeth. "We used to go to Barcelona and bring back illegal home-brewed absinthe. It's definitely a drug. I remember us getting drunk on it and walking through a plate glass window into a club – six of us straight through the glass and onto the dancefloor."
Donate Life – Transplant and You
Vegetarian Curry
Personal hero: Leonardo Da Vinci
Not just Karna, three other characters could have been better utilised. First, there are the female characters – Draupadi (Katrina Kaif) and Kunti (Nikhila Trikha). As in most Bollywood flicks, Kaif’s leading lady is a good eye-candy. And yet, so much more could be done with her. I mean, if nothing else, if the trailer didn’t remind you of a certain famous widow, clearly you have escaped Indian hegemony in all form. As for Trikha, I have actually never seen her before. The role seemed appropriate for Tabu (or what Shabana Azmi could have played a few decades ago). And what could have been done with the role? A mother torn between her sons — drama, tragedy, emotion….
then we can lay off rich union janitors
traces of those hay blades,
If you think you have been a victim of an immigration scam artist, seek professional legal help immediately from an immigration attorney. To find a qualified immigration attorney in your area, you can contact AILA toll free at 1-800-954-0254 or online at http://www.ailalawyer.com/.
Dog used as “sex toy” in Arizona, US
The three new beers are brewed in this community, just northwest of Syracuse on the eastern shore of Onondaga Lake. The original beers continue to be brewed in Nova Scotia, British Columbia and Ontario.
glitter and glass,
But I have to tell you, I really enjoyed getting stuck into creating with these papers. There are so many colours and designs to choose from that it feels like opening the tin of chocolates at Christmas and having to choose which one to have first! That's a tough choice isn't it!!
But in a job market where the competition for getting hired is fierce, the thing for applicants to do may be to look for the job that's off of everyone else's radar and put it onto your own.
Fat Sandra was still nibbling on bog roll to fill her stomach.
I’ve His gude word o’ promise that some gladsome day, the King
Everything came to a head the next day. We had fucked and sucked a little in the morning. His luggage and printed out party schedule made me think this guy really was planning to stay the whole weekend. I was trying to see if I could overlook his irreconcilable flaws, and just fuck the weekend away, but of course...he had to take ya girl there. Long, headache-inducing story cut short, after I had cooked us both breakfast, we got into an arguement that started over something minor--me telling him to log off of my computer. He not only ignored my request (as he sat there chatting it up with chicks on Facebook) but then told me, in an unacceptably loud voice, "What you need to do is eat your breakfast and get on the computer later! I'm doing something and what you have to do isn't that important!" He went on to call me selfish and I was thinking, Somebody please slap me because I KNOW this fool isn't a) disrespecting me in my house and b) sitting here eating food I cooked, using my computer and otherwise soaking up all my fucking hospitality without having the decency to come correct! I knew I was getting nowhere with this arrogant, audacious, insolent, rude and undeservedly cocky dude so, I made him an offer he couldn't refuse: "If you think I'm selfish. Or any other unfavorable characteristic. You can pack your shit up and get the fuck out of my house." Again, if he hadn't gotten dropped off, I would have put his ass out after we fucked the night before. And I told him that. He got up and didn't say a word as he put his plate in the kitchen, went in the room to gather his things, and left.
I've used all the Neutrogena products. Neutrogena in the bottle (too thick!), in the bar (too slippery), Fresh Foaming (meh), the Deep Clean line (too ointment-y), Oil-Free Acne Wash (makes your skin smell like a band-aid), Oil-Free Acne Wash Pink Grapefruit products (the citrus smell gets old real fast), and Visibly Even face wash (zzzzzzz).
Even worse is an economy in which retailers supposedly do not become profitable for the year until the Xmas gift-buying season—thus the term “Black Friday”.
Shortly after, the nose and tongue appeared. I breathed a sigh of relief that, for the first time, we were about to witness a totally natural, unassisted birth–something we have been praying for for some time now. As we watched, Shiloh took a couple breaks, then resumed pushing. Suddenly, after about 30 minutes since we had first seen her lay down, the foal popped out. Within another minute, the foal broke free from its sack, and began to try to right itself.
Umesh Yadav, though is growing in stature hardly needs this smashing in T-20. He needs to be taken care of and saved for Tests or else he will lose his beautiful length that makes his outswingers most deadly, not a finished product yet, this kid has a lot of potential. Ishant, SreeSanth, Varun Aaron are no where to be seen. Zaheer is one of the many. R P Singh seems to be getting his rhythm back but still nothing of note. The less said about Munaf the better. Maybe an Awana has made some moves but he is not pushing any of the regulars is he ? Vinay Kumar and Praveen Kumar have been ordinary at best. So the biggest worry for India the pace bowling is at tatters.
2009.E-XI/2/1961. On retiring from the practice of law. University of Chicago Maroon, Chicago, Illinois.
2.) Drift Through Our Cloud (Wrath - Philip Stoltie) - 3:30
Now, more than ever, I know I am there for a reason. I know this all happened for a reason. I know it’s possible to fall in love with a city. And I’m looking forward to seeing what the city and the next nine months hold for me.
“This finding that nearly a third of all sitting legislators were first elected to their positions by closed party insider dealing is not a judgment on the individual legislators themselves, but rather a sad indictment on our local democracy that forbids voters from choosing their party nominees,” said Dick Dadey, executive director of Citizens Union.
“Civilizations will end within 15 to 30 years unless immediate action is taken against problems facing mankind,” said George Wald, a Harvard biologist.
Being a feminist is an important part of who I am and how I identify myself, and many of the lessons I’ve learned revolve around this topic. Here are 20 important lessons or realizations I’ve experienced during my time in college:
This is one of the many, lovely illustrations; Mrs Howe of New York in Mourning dress.
New job: Despite my dropping the f-bomb within the first 3 seconds of my first interview, these nice people hired me on to be a Writer/Strategist for their content team, which basically means that I'll be writing some blog copy, wrangling some freelancers, helping companies that don't know how to Internet Internet better, and, um, doin' some other stuff. It's a shiny-new position, so none of us are entirely sure what it'll entail aside from my generally making myself useful in a geeky way. Which is pretty much what I live to do, so, yay!
The rules are:
Tonight in a bar alone I'm sitting
wholly and without reservation.
Drop in rate $10.00
I get so involved every time she announces that I indulge myself in trying out new ways, techniques and become more creative in thinking what I can do.., this is what I tried and turned out very well, my kids just loved it so much, It's such a keeper recipe, This monthly mingle of Kalyani's is such an enjoyable event as I keep trying new methods of cooking and baking.., here is one such thing.., I took a chance and it really worked out, go and try it out and tell me if you liked it.
The other day I finally decided to break out the mini doughnut pans I had bought last year with one of my holiday gift cards, but never used. We had friends coming over, I wanted to make treats and, reading the instructions, doughnuts seemed doable in the time I had available. I was planning to roll some of them in cinnamon sugar and some in powdered sugar. Although I know Miss B and her pals love glazed doughnuts, I didn’t think I would have the time for that extra step.
One Kemble Street,
Looks like we have another Hot Thing One situation on our hands, posse. Dammit, I thought I was free from the sorcery of beautiful people.
to drown them out
03. Onye Mmanya
Dont focus on the slip up focus on the get up.
EMI ~ 1999/1968
Everyone looks. Everyone listens.
Lately, my answer has been simple: oats in a jar.
Starring: Buster Keaton
"We aren't intimate enough"
2. Nardis
Pictures are SO important. Everything looks better with a picture. Chances are whatever you’re promoting has a visual aspect, whether it’s a screenshot, promotional poster, book cover, or headshot. Use it! And what’s more, have a place that is easily accessible for people to find this image, or video, or song clip, or book excerpt. Include a link to that location in your press release. This should go towards the end of what you write–give ‘em the info, then give ‘em the goods. If what you’re promoting has a website, it should be located on that website. If it doesn’t, consider keeping things small enough to zip and attach to the press release email, or find a place to host the images, etc, for you. There are plenty of websites you can get for free — hey, WordPress is one of them! Bottom line, have images and other assets, make sure they are good quality stuff, and have them ready to give to the press along with your release.
If you know anyone who attended Governor’s School, ever, you have probably long since gotten sick of them rattling on about it. I don’t blame you. I talk about GSW (Gov. School West, which is the best) way too much to be tolerable. One of my friends who was not lucky enough to attend once said to me, “It’s like you’re all in a cult.”
My Pastor was talking today about Martyrs during a sermon a few weeks ago….. Those who have given EVERYTHING for their Faith… their Love…. to, and for, the One True God…. When faced with the opportunity to deny that Faith… that God they served or…. face a death in such a horrific manner… they chose to stay faithful to the One who had been faithful to them, trusting in what the Word of God said that if we were faithful, (even if we must die for it) He will give us the crown of life…. (Revelation 2:10)
Here are the ingredients you'll need. This acutally will make two lasagne's (lasagne...I don't know is it plural like geese?? Okay I'm not an English major, just remember that). Anyways, it will make one vegetarian and one with meat sauce. If you prefer to have one or the other then you'll just have to double that ingredient.
I thought it would be a rather busy week, in fact I thought it would be manic but as it turns out everything is playing out at a reasonable speed. Unlike normal weeks, all the finished quilts have been collected and the next batch has been dropped off all on the same day. I don’t know what I will do with myself for the rest of the week! I mustn’t kid myself as I know I have loads of things on my weekly To-Do List that needs doing before Friday evening. Next week is going to be busy but I expect quite a lot of fun as well.
I am the same person although,
Brown the turkey in a medium pan on the stove. Drain excess fat and then add to crockpot.
Some weeks are easier than others when it comes to getting this column done. This Friday’s isn’t easy, mainly because of all the different possible permutations this weekend. It could turn out to be a cakewalk against Norwich, and then on Sunday our rivals could lose in matches against sides that are fighting for the title and relegation. In a couple of days we could already be kicking back and looking forward to the Euros and the next season.
I'm not proposing that we further subdivide the community of parenting blogs, nor do I have a suggestion as to how (or whether at all) to reframe the language. I just want us to start understanding one another just a little bit better.
Long live the aubergine!
Mr Barroso received a standing ovation from many Conservative MEPs when the result of the vote was announced — despite his membership of the underground Maoist MRPP (Reorganising Movement of the Proletariat Party, later PCTP/MRPP Communist Party of the Portuguese Workers/Revolutionary Movement of the Portuguese Proletariat).
Cascading beauty
So, it is perhaps no surprise that one of the dissidents, Sylvester Entri, actually referred to himself as a “Crocodile bin Abdullah” after he was challenged on Radio Free Sarawak last year about his secret conversion to Islam – a fact that he had kept secret from his Dayak voters!
Stephanie Hilvitz I seem to always be in a creative groove….but I do think working in series helps keep my groove going. An idea is sparked from objects or patterns or an idea I may have seen on a blog that really excites me. I’ll take elements of this and play with it, expand upon it.
And drouthy (thirsty) neibors neibors meet,
Two New Spring Measurement Activities!!!
7. Adhere all design elements, use dimensional foam for moon and rocket
Gwisai and five others were brutally tortured during the next 72 hours, he testified Thursday at an initial hearing.
Lastly…
Bush's new album "The Red Shoes" is a diverse affair, almost a
As I watched this steamy relic from a bygone era flicker before me, I was amazed by the sheer amount of options that lay languishing before me in the reticulated viewing sphere that is my mind's eye. Technically, I could approach the film as yet another uninspired slice of bland pornography. Except, Lasse Braun isn't the type of director to allow his films to be seen merely as mindless masturbation material for the mentally challenged masses. And by casting Catherine Ringer as the lead, he makes it abundantly clear that he's not interested in making your run-of-the-mill fuck film. In fact, with only four sex scenes in total, some might say: what fucking? Nevertheless, opening with the sight of Catherine Ringer, a performer best known for being one half of the great French new wave duo, Les Rita Mitsouko (Fred Chichin, R.I.P.), stretching her legs in a black leotard and a scrumptious pair of red thigh-high leg warmers, Body Love makes the first of its many bold statements. You see, what Catherine's character Martine is doing smacks of being artistic, and if there's anything the raincoat crowd hates more, it's to be reminded that there is art in this world. Still stretching in her leg warmers (the kind that I've seen on headless mannequins hanging from the rafters at American Apparel), Martine tells her father, "The Baron" (Jean-Gérard Sorlin), that her stepmother Glenda (Glenda Farrel), a world famous actress, has left. Watching her drive off through a window located on an upper floor of their spacious mansion/castle, the way Martine stood there motionless reminded me of something you might see in an Ingmar Bergman film, or a parody of an Ingmar Bergman film. If that wasn't enough, the music of Klaus Schulze can be heard throughout the film. And, of course, we're not talking about your stereotypical "bom chicka wah wah" porn music, Klaus makes cutting edge synthesizer music for discerning fans of electronic music.
Now four more bodies are found, marked with his fatal signature. The residents of Nashville fear a madman has returned, decades later, to finish his sick fairy tale. Homicide Lieutenant Taylor Jackson believes the killings are the work of a copycat killer who's even more terrifying. For this monster is meticulously honing his craft as he mimics famous serial murders…proving that the past is not to be forgotten.
My advanced planning consisted of visualizing how I would restrain myself from saying anything that might harm their impression of me as a quiet, conscientious worker. I’m generally not the talkative sort, but for some reason I can get oddly impassionate about the most minor issues, and then there goes my carefully constructed facade. One minute, I’m the consummate professional and the next, I’m ranting wildly about how stupid it is that we condone 2-em paragraph indents. Then they think I care, and I end up with some unwanted assignment.
1. Texas Rio Red grapefruit, .25/ea. at Sprouts (through 4/13/11)
How fabulous would these be for bridal portraits?! I'm imagining a bride sitting in these crazy gorgeous VBCs with her groom by her side:
Want to jump on a plane and give you a hug
“Oh heck no,” Krystal replied. “It’s not due til Monday, and besides, I think we can talk old Harry into letting us have an extra week.”
It’s weird for me to try to explain my excitement for new things, I guess.
Good Shop /Bad Shop and Dungeon in a Box. These two pieces are interrelated: the first (which is part of an ongoing series) presents another unique magic shop, "Mad Varto's," while the second expands upon one of the devious magical items found therein. While I am not typically a big fan of "tournament-y" or "gimmicky" one-off adventure scenarios, I must tip my hat to Regan for the "Dungeon in a Box" concept. I don't want to give too much away here, just suffice to say that the "Dungeon in a Box" would fit in to practically any campaign and, with slight adaptation / modification, could be used to test the PCs in a wide variety of ways. It is s simple but highly expandable idea.
Lewis Schaffer: Free until proved guilty Mike Tawil
Supplicating to a woman that you are not in a romantic relationship with already is a turn off. WHY? Not b/c it’s an evil thing, but b/c in my eyes it’s not in a man’s nature to be supplicating to that degree with something or someone who is not giving him something in return. In my eyes, Men are usually very self-focused by nature and will almost never in their raw state give anything to anyone he has not established some sort of relationship with. This is the reward in winning a man over – he will then become supplicating towards you in some ways b/c he has an established relationship with you. A man doing supplicating out of that arena comes off as desperate.
It is about as unlucky of a number that there is in that profession.
Can’t wait to get started posting!
every day:
